Ohio, session 136, HB800.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 5753.021 and 5753.031 be amended and sections 3301.591 and 3301.592 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3301.591. (A) The department of education and workforce shall conduct a survey of, and hold stakeholder meetings with, each city, local, and exempted village school district regarding the implementation of preschool programs and all-day kindergarten on and after July 1, 2031. The survey shall solicit input from districts about the structural challenges or issues districts must address to facilitate that implementation. The survey shall request information about all of the following: (1) Classroom and school building capacity; (2) Teacher and staff shortages and extended hours; (3) Teacher and staff professional development and standards; (4) Transportation; (5) Time and cost burden estimates for the implementation; (6) Any other potential issues related to the new programs and requirements. (B) In addition to the requirements under division (A) of this section, the department of education and workforce shall solicit information, in a form and manner determined by the department, about the statewide implementation of preschool programs and all-day kindergarten from all of the following: (1) The Ohio federation of teachers; (2) The Ohio education association; (3) The Ohio school boards association; (4) The buckeye association of school administrators; (5) The Ohio association of school business officials; (6) The Ohio association of elementary school administrators; (7) The Ohio association of secondary school administrators. (C) The department of education and workforce shall complete its responsibilities under divisions (A) and (B) of this section not later than February 1, 2027. The department of education and workforce shall share all the survey data and information from the stakeholder outreach required under divisions (A) and (B) of this section with the department of children and youth once that department is established. The department of education and workforce shall invite the department of children and youth to participate in any stakeholder meetings it conducts as part of that outreach. (D) Not later than February 15, 2027, the department of education and workforce shall prepare a report regarding the findings of the stakeholder outreach required under divisions (A) and (B) of this section. The department of education and workforce shall submit to the legislative service commission the report and the unfiltered survey data and information provided by stakeholders. (E) Not later than March 15, 2027, the legislative service commission shall do all of the following: (1) Prepare a report that describes the law and estimated costs associated with implementing preschool programs and all-day kindergarten on and after July 1, 2031; (2) Conduct a public presentation regarding the report prescribed under this division to each of the following: (a) The finance committee of the house of representatives; (b) The standing committee of the house of representatives that considers primary and secondary education legislation; (c) The finance committee of the senate; (d) The standing committee of the senate that considers primary and secondary education legislation; (e) The state board of education. (3) Transmit the report prescribed under this division to all of the following: (a) The governor; (b) The office of budget and management; (c) The facilities construction commission. (F) It is the intent of the general assembly to provide one-time funding to school districts in the main operating and capital budgets of the 136th general assembly for the purposes of implementing preschool programs and all-day kindergarten on and after July 1, 2031. It is the intent of the general assembly, if funding is provided, to establish a method to distribute that one-time funding outside of the distribution of state core foundation funding under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code. The general assembly shall consider providing a total amount of the funding that is not less than the cost estimate included in the legislative service commission's report under division (E) of this section. If the total amount of funding is less than that cost estimate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the governor shall issue a public statement regarding why the total amount of funding was not provided. Sec. 3301.592. (A) A city, local, or exempted village school district may submit to the department of education and workforce a request for a waiver from complying with the preschool and all-day kindergarten requirements in Chapters 3301., 3313., 3314., 3317., 3321., and 3323. of the Revised Code scheduled to take effect in the 2031-2032 school year. (B) A request for a waiver shall be submitted not later than the first day of February prior to the school year for which the district is seeking the waiver. Prior to submitting the request, the district's board of education shall hold a public hearing on the issue and adopt a resolution requesting the waiver. (C)(1) Within thirty days after receiving a request under division (B) of this section, the department shall approve or disapprove the request and notify the district. (2) If the department disapproves a waiver request, the district may appeal the decision within 15 days after receiving notice of the waiver's denial. The appeal shall be made to the state board of education. (D) Within fifteen days after receiving the appeal request under division (C)(2) of this section, the state board shall conduct a public hearing regarding the appeal. At that public hearing, the district superintendent and the deputy director of primary and secondary education shall each make a presentation to the state board regarding the disapproval and the state board shall vote on whether to approve or disapprove the appeal. If a majority of the members of the state board vote in favor of the appeal, the waiver is approved, notwithstanding the department's denial under division (C) of this section. (E) A district that has a waiver approved under this section may request an extension of that waiver to the 2032-2033 school year. A district that has a waiver extended to the 2032-2033 school year may request an additional extension of that waiver to the 2033-2034 school year. The procedure for requesting a waiver extension is the same as the procedure for requesting an initial waiver. (F) Notwithstanding anything in the Revised Code to the contrary, a school district that has a waiver or waiver extension approved under this section shall provide and administer kindergarten and preschool instruction in the same manner as that instruction was required to be provided on June 30, 2031. (G) Beginning with the 2033-2034 school year and each school year thereafter, the department shall cease granting waivers under this section. Sec. 5753.021. (A) For the purposes of funding the education needs of this state, funding efforts to alleviate problem sports gaming, and defraying the costs of enforcing and administering the law governing sports gaming and the tax levied by this section, a tax is hereby levied on the sports gaming receipts of received by a sports gaming proprietor at the rate of twenty per cent of the sports gaming receipts received by the proprietor from the operation of sports gaming in this state. The tax is levied as follows: (1) For tax periods beginning before January 1, 2028, twenty per cent of sports gaming receipts; (2) For tax periods beginning on or after January 1, 2028, as follows: (a) Twenty per cent, in the case of sports gaming receipts received by a sports gaming proprietor whose share of the sports gaming market in this state is less than two and one-quarter per cent; (b) Thirty-three per cent, in the case of sports gaming receipts received by all other sports gaming proprietors. (B) In June and December of each year, the casino control commission shall determine the percentage share of the sports gaming market in this state held by each sports gaming proprietor. That determination shall apply for the purposes of calculating the tax due under division (A) of this section for the six-month period that begins on the first day of the first month after the determination is made. (C) The tax imposed under this section is in addition to any other taxes or fees imposed under the Revised Code. Sec. 5753.031. (A) For the purpose of receiving and distributing, and accounting for, revenue received from the tax levied by section 5753.021 of the Revised Code and from fines imposed under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code, the following funds are created in the state treasury: (1) The sports gaming revenue fund; (2) The sports gaming tax administration fund, which the tax commissioner shall use to defray the costs incurred in administering the tax levied by section 5753.021 of the Revised Code; (3) The sports gaming profits education fund, which shall be used for the support of public and nonpublic education for students in grades kindergarten through twelve as determined in appropriations made by the general assembly.; (4) The problem sports gaming fund; (5) The sports gaming profits preschool fund, which shall be used to fund preschool programs that are licensed under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and operated by public schools. (B)(1) All of the following shall be deposited into the sports gaming revenue fund: (a) All money collected from the tax levied under section 5753.021 of the Revised Code; (b) The remainder of the fees described in division (G)(2) of section 3775.02 of the Revised Code, after the Ohio casino control commission deposits the required amount in the sports gaming profits veterans fund under that division; (c) Unclaimed winnings collected under division (F) of section 3775.10 of the Revised Code; (d) Any fines collected under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code. (2) All other fees collected under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code shall be deposited into the casino control commission fund created under section 5753.03 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) From the sports gaming revenue fund, the director of budget and management shall transfer as needed to the tax refund fund amounts equal to the refunds certified by the tax commissioner under section 5753.06 of the Revised Code and attributable to the tax levied under section 5753.021 of the Revised Code. (2) Not later than the fifteenth day of each month, the director of budget and management shall transfer from the sports gaming revenue fund to the sports gaming tax administration fund the amount necessary to reimburse the department of taxation's actual expenses incurred in administering the tax levied under section 5753.021 of the Revised Code. (3) On or before the fifteenth day of the month following the end of each calendar quarter beginning on or after January 1, 2028, the director of budget and management shall transfer an amount from the sports gaming revenue fund to the sports gaming profits preschool fund. The amount shall equal thirteen thirty-thirds of the amount in the sports gaming fund remaining after making the transfers required by divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section, multiplied by a fraction, the denominator of which is the total amount deposited in the sports gaming revenue fund since the last transfer under this division and the numerator of which is the portion of that amount that is attributable to the tax levied under division (A)(2)(b) of section 5753.021 of the Revised Code. (4) Of the amount in the sports gaming revenue fund remaining after making the transfers required by divisions (C)(1) and (2) to (3) of this section, the director of budget and management shall transfer, on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the end of each calendar quarter, amounts to each fund as follows: (a) Ninety-eight per cent to the sports gaming profits education fund; (b) Two per cent to the problem sports gaming fund. (D) All interest generated by the funds created under this section shall be credited back to them. Section 2. That existing sections 5753.021 and 5753.031 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That sections 3301.50, 3301.53, 3301.54, 3301.56, 3313.48, 3313.64, 3313.646, 3313.842, 3313.98, 3313.981, 3314.03, 3314.08, 3317.011, 3317.0110, 3317.02, 3317.0213, 3317.03, 3321.01, 3321.05, and 3323.02 be amended and sections 3301.542, 3313.6415, and 3317.083 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3301.50. Except as otherwise provided under division (B)(C) of section 3301.54 of the Revised Code, the issuing of any educator license designated for teaching in a preschool setting pursuant to section 3319.22 of the Revised Code shall not be construed as requiring any person who does not hold such a license to obtain one in order to be employed as a teacher in a pre-kindergarten program. However, a person hired after July 1, 1988, to direct a preschool program regulated by the department of children and youth under sections 3301.52 to 3301.57 of the Revised Code, other than a program operated by a nontax-supported eligible nonpublic school, shall hold a valid educator license designated as appropriate for teaching or being an administrator in a preschool setting issued pursuant to section 3319.22 of the Revised Code plus the four courses required by division (A)(1) of section 3301.54 of the Revised Code, unless division (A)(4) of that section applies to the person. Sec. 3301.53. (A) The department of children and youth shall formulate and prescribe by rule adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code minimum standards to be applied to preschool programs operated by school district boards of education, county boards of developmental disabilities, community schools, or eligible nonpublic schools. The rules shall include the following: (1) Standards ensuring that the preschool program is located in a safe and convenient facility that accommodates the enrollment of the program, is of the quality to support the growth and development of the children according to the program objectives, and meets the requirements of section 3301.55 of the Revised Code; (2) Standards ensuring that supervision, discipline, and programs will be administered according to established objectives and procedures; (3) Standards ensuring that preschool staff members and nonteaching employees are recruited, employed, assigned, evaluated, and provided in-service education without discrimination on the basis of age, color, national origin, race, or sex; and that preschool staff members and nonteaching employees are assigned responsibilities in accordance with written position descriptions commensurate with their training and experience; (4) A requirement that boards of education intending to establish a preschool program demonstrate a need for a preschool program prior to establishing the program; (5) Requirements that children participating in preschool programs have been immunized to the extent considered appropriate by the director of children and youth to prevent the spread of communicable disease; (6)(5) Requirements that the parents of preschool children complete the emergency medical authorization form specified in section 3313.712 of the Revised Code; (7)(6) The department of education and workforce's rules or standards for providing special education and related services for children with disabilities under section 3323.02 of the Revised Code incorporated by reference, as appropriate. (B) The department of children and youth shall ensure that the rules adopted under sections 3301.52 to 3301.58 of the Revised Code are consistent with and meet or exceed the requirements of Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code with regard to child care centers that serve preschool children. The department shall review all such rules at least once every five years. (C) The department shall adopt rules for school child programs that are consistent with and meet or exceed the requirements of the rules adopted for child care centers that serve school-age children under Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3301.54. (A)(1) Each preschool program shall be directed and supervised by a director, a head teacher, an elementary principal, or a site administrator who is on site and responsible for supervision of the program. Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2) or (3) of this section, this person shall hold a valid educator license designated as appropriate for teaching or being an administrator in a preschool setting issued pursuant to section 3319.22 of the Revised Code and have completed at least four courses in child development or early childhood education from an accredited college, university, or technical college. (2) If the person was employed prior to July 1, 1988, by a school district board of education or an eligible nonpublic school to direct a preschool program, the person shall be considered to meet the requirements of this section if the person holds a valid kindergarten-primary certificate described under former division (A) of section 3319.22 of the Revised Code as it existed on January 1, 1996. (3) If the person is employed to direct a preschool program operated by an eligible, nontax-supported, nonpublic school, the person shall be considered to meet the requirements of this section if the person holds a valid teaching certificate issued in accordance with section 3301.071 of the Revised Code. (B) Each head teacher hired by a preschool program on or after the effective date of this amendment shall hold at least a bachelor's degree. (C) Each preschool staff member hired on or after the effective date of this amendment shall be meet both of the following: (1) Be at least eighteen years of age and have a high school diploma or a certificate of high school equivalence issued by the department of education and workforce or a primary-secondary education or higher education agency of another state, except that a staff member may be less than eighteen years of age if the staff member is a graduate of a two-year vocational child-care training program approved by the department, or is a student enrolled in the second year of such a program that leads to high school graduation, provided that the student performs duties in the preschool program under the continuous supervision of an experienced preschool staff member and receives periodic supervision from the vocational child-care training program teacher-coordinator in the student's high school. ; (2) Hold a child development associate certification or equivalent credential. (D) A preschool staff member shall annually complete fifteen hours of in-service training in child development or early childhood education, professional development, child abuse recognition and prevention, and first aid, and in the prevention, recognition, and management of communicable diseases, until a total of forty-five hours has been completed, unless the staff member holds an associate or higher degree in child development or early childhood education from an accredited college, university, or technical college, or any type of educator license designated as appropriate for teaching in an associate teaching position in a preschool setting issued by the state board of education pursuant to section 3319.22 of the Revised Codepursuant to an individualized professional development plan developed by the school district, eligible nonpublic school, county board of developmental disabilities, or community school operating the preschool program. Sec. 3301.542. Each school district board of education, eligible nonpublic school, county board of developmental disabilities, and community school operating a preschool program shall pay head teachers a salary of not less than thirty-five thousand dollars per year. Sec. 3301.56. (A) The director, head teacher, elementary principal, or site administrator who is on site and responsible for supervision of each preschool program shall be responsible for the following: (1) Ensuring that the health and safety of the children are safeguarded by an organized program of school health services designed to identify child health problems and to coordinate school and community health resources for children, as evidenced by but not limited to: (a) Requiring immunization and compliance with emergency medical authorization requirements in accordance with rules adopted by the department of education and workforce under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code; (b) Providing procedures for emergency situations, including fire drills, rapid dismissals, tornado drills, and school safety drills in accordance with section 3737.73 of the Revised Code, and keeping records of such drills or dismissals; (c) Posting emergency procedures in preschool rooms and making them available to school personnel, children, and parents; (d) Posting emergency numbers by each telephone; (e) Supervising grounds, play areas, and other facilities when scheduled for use by children; (f) Providing first-aid facilities and materials. (2) Maintaining cumulative records for each child; (3) Supervising each child's admission, placement, and withdrawal according to established procedures; (4) Preparing at least once annually for each group of children in the program a roster of names and telephone numbers of parents, guardians, and custodians of children in the group and, on request, furnishing the roster for each group to the parents, guardians, and custodians of children in that group. The director may prepare a similar roster of all children in the program and, on request, make it available to the parents, guardians, and custodians, of children in the program. The director shall not include in either roster the name or telephone number of any parent, guardian, or custodian who requests that the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's name or number not be included, and shall not furnish any roster to any person other than a parent, guardian, or custodian of a child in the program. (5) Ensuring that clerical and custodial services are provided for the program; (6) Supervising the instructional program and the daily operation of the program; (7) Supervising and evaluating preschool staff members according to a planned sequence of observations and evaluation conferences, and supervising nonteaching employees. (B)(1) In each program the maximum number of children per preschool staff member and the maximum group size by age category of children shall be as follows: 1 2 3 A Age Group Maximum Group Size Staff Member/ Child Ratio B Birth to less than 12 months 12 1:5, or 2:12 if two preschool staff members are in the room C 12 months to less than 18 months 12 1:6 D 18 months to less than 30 months 14 1:7 E 30 months to less than 3 years 16 1:8 F 3-year-olds3- and 4-year-olds 2420 1:121:10 G 4- and 5-year-olds not in school 28 1:14 (2) When age groups are combined, the maximum number of children per preschool staff member shall be determined by the age of the youngest child in the group, except that when no more than one child thirty months of age or older receives child care in a group in which all the other children are in the next older age group, the maximum number of children per child-care staff member and maximum group size requirements of the older age group established under division (B)(1) of this section shall apply. (3) In a room where children are napping, if all the children are at least eighteen months of age, the maximum number of children per preschool staff member shall, for a period not to exceed one and one-half hours in any twenty-four hour day, be twice the maximum number of children per preschool staff member established under division (B)(1) of this section if all the following criteria are met: (a) At least one preschool staff member is present in the room; (b) Sufficient preschool staff members are present on the preschool program premises to comply with division (B)(1) of this section; (c) Naptime preparations have been completed and the children are resting or napping. (4) Any accredited program that uses the Montessori method endorsed by the American Montessori society or the association Montessori internationale as its primary method of instruction and is licensed as a preschool program under section 3301.58 of the Revised Code may combine preschool children of ages three to five years old with children enrolled in kindergarten. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in division (B)(2) of this section, when such age groups are combined, the maximum number of children per preschool staff member shall be twelve and the maximum group size shall be twenty-four children. (C) In each building in which a preschool program is operated there shall be on the premises, and readily available at all times, at least one employee who has completed a course in first aid and in the prevention, recognition, and management of communicable diseases which is approved by the state department of health, and an employee who has completed a course in child abuse recognition and prevention. (D) Any parent, guardian, or custodian of a child enrolled in a preschool program shall be permitted unlimited access to the school during its hours of operation to contact the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's child, evaluate the care provided by the program, or evaluate the premises, or for other purposes approved by the director. Upon entering the premises, the parent, guardian, or custodian shall report to the school office. Sec. 3313.48. (A) The board of education of each city, exempted village, local, and joint vocational school district shall provide for the free education of the youth of school age within the district under its jurisdiction, at such places as will be most convenient for the attendance of the largest number thereof. Each school so provided and each chartered nonpublic school shall be open for instruction with pupils in attendance, including scheduled classes, supervised activities, and approved education options but excluding lunch and breakfast periods and extracurricular activities, for not less than four hundred fifty-five hours in the case of pupils in kindergarten unless such pupils are provided all-day kindergarten, as defined in section 3321.05 of the Revised Code, in which case the pupils shall be in attendance for nine hundred ten hours; nine hundred ten hours in the case of pupils in grades one kindergarten through six; and one thousand one hours in the case of pupils in grades seven through twelve in each school year, which may include all of the following: (1) Up to the equivalent of two school days per year during which pupils would otherwise be in attendance but are not required to attend for the purpose of individualized parent-teacher conferences and reporting periods; (2) Up to the equivalent of two school days per year during which pupils would otherwise be in attendance but are not required to attend for professional meetings of teachers; (3) Morning and afternoon recess periods of not more than fifteen minutes duration per period for pupils in grades kindergarten through six. (B) Not later than thirty days prior to adopting a school calendar, the board of education of each city, exempted village, and local school district shall hold a public hearing on the school calendar, addressing topics that include, but are not limited to, the total number of hours in a school year, length of school day, and beginning and end dates of instruction. The public hearing required under this division need not be a separate, individual hearing and may be part of another public hearing or board meeting. (C) No school operated by a city, exempted village, local, or joint vocational school district shall reduce the number of hours in each school year that the school is scheduled to be open for instruction from the number of hours per year the school was open for instruction during the previous school year unless the reduction is approved by a resolution adopted by the district board of education. Any reduction so approved shall not result in fewer hours of instruction per school year than the applicable number of hours required under division (A) of this section. (D) Prior to making any change in the hours or days in which a high school under its jurisdiction is open for instruction, the board of education of each city, exempted village, and local school district shall consider the compatibility of the proposed change with the scheduling needs of any joint vocational school district in which any of the high school's students are also enrolled. The board shall consider the impact of the proposed change on student access to the instructional programs offered by the joint vocational school district, incentives for students to participate in career-technical education, transportation, and the timing of graduation. The board shall provide the joint vocational school district board with advance notice of the proposed change and the two boards shall enter into a written agreement prescribing reasonable accommodations to meet the scheduling needs of the joint vocational school district prior to implementation of the change. (E) Subject to section 3327.016 of the Revised Code, prior to making any change in the hours or days in which a school under its jurisdiction is open for instruction, the board of education of each city, exempted village, and local school district shall consider the compatibility of the proposed change with the scheduling needs of any community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code to which the district is required to transport students under sections 3314.09 and 3327.01 of the Revised Code. The board shall consider the impact of the proposed change on student access to the instructional programs offered by the community school, transportation, and the timing of graduation. The board shall provide the sponsor, governing authority, and operator of the community school with advance notice of the proposed change, and the board and the governing authority, or operator if such authority is delegated to the operator, shall enter into a written agreement prescribing reasonable accommodations to meet the scheduling needs of the community school prior to implementation of the change. (F) Subject to section 3327.016 of the Revised Code, prior to making any change in the hours or days in which the schools under its jurisdiction are open for instruction, the board of education of each city, exempted village, and local school district shall consult with the chartered nonpublic schools to which the district is required to transport students under section 3327.01 of the Revised Code and shall consider the effect of the proposed change on the schedule for transportation of those students to their nonpublic schools. The governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school shall consult with each school district board of education that transports students to the chartered nonpublic school under section 3327.01 of the Revised Code prior to making any change in the hours or days in which the nonpublic school is open for instruction. (G) The department of education and workforce shall not adopt or enforce any rule or standard that imposes on chartered nonpublic schools the procedural requirements imposed on school districts by divisions (B), (C), (D), and (E) of this section. Sec. 3313.64. (A) As used in this section and in section 3313.65 of the Revised Code: (1)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(1)(b) of this section, "parent" means either parent, unless the parents are separated or divorced or their marriage has been dissolved or annulled, in which case "parent" means the parent who is the residential parent and legal custodian of the child. When a child is in the legal custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent, "parent" means the parent with residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities. When a child is in the permanent custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent, "parent" means the parent who was divested of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child and the right to have the child live with the parent and be the legal custodian of the child and all residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities. (b) When a child is the subject of a power of attorney executed under sections 3109.51 to 3109.62 of the Revised Code, "parent" means the grandparent designated as attorney in fact under the power of attorney. When a child is the subject of a caretaker authorization affidavit executed under sections 3109.64 to 3109.73 of the Revised Code, "parent" means the grandparent that executed the affidavit. (2) "Legal custody," "permanent custody," and "residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities" have the same meanings as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. (3) "School district" or "district" means a city, local, or exempted village school district and excludes any school operated in an institution maintained by the department of youth services. (4) Except as used in division (C)(2) of this section, "home" means a home, institution, foster home, group home, or other residential facility in this state that receives and cares for children, to which any of the following applies: (a) The home is licensed, certified, or approved for such purpose by the state or is maintained by the department of youth services. (b) The home is operated by a person who is licensed, certified, or approved by the state to operate the home for such purpose. (c) The home accepted the child through a placement by a person licensed, certified, or approved to place a child in such a home by the state. (d) The home is a children's home created under section 5153.21 or 5153.36 of the Revised Code. (5) "Agency" means all of the following: (a) A public children services agency; (b) An organization that holds a certificate issued by the department of children and youth in accordance with the requirements of section 5103.03 of the Revised Code and assumes temporary or permanent custody of children through commitment, agreement, or surrender, and places children in family homes for the purpose of adoption; (c) Comparable agencies of other states or countries that have complied with applicable requirements of section 2151.39 of the Revised Code or as applicable, sections 5103.20 to 5103.22 or 5103.23 to 5103.237 of the Revised Code. (6) A child is placed for adoption if either of the following occurs: (a) An agency to which the child has been permanently committed or surrendered enters into an agreement with a person pursuant to section 5103.16 of the Revised Code for the care and adoption of the child. (b) The child's natural parent places the child pursuant to section 5103.16 of the Revised Code with a person who will care for and adopt the child. (7) "Preschool child with a disability" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Child," unless otherwise indicated, includes preschool children with disabilities. (9) "Active duty" means active duty pursuant to an executive order of the president of the United States, an act of the congress of the United States, or section 5919.29 or 5923.21 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as otherwise provided in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code for admittance to kindergarten and first grade, a child who is at least five but under twenty-two years of age and any preschool child with a disability shall be admitted to school as provided in this division. (1) A child shall be admitted to the schools of the school district in which the child's parent resides. (2) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section or division (B) of section 2151.362 and section 3317.30 of the Revised Code, a child who does not reside in the district where the child's parent resides shall be admitted to the schools of the district in which the child resides if any of the following applies: (a) The child is in the legal or permanent custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent. (b) The child resides in a home. (c) The child requires special education. (3) A child who is not entitled under division (B)(2) of this section to be admitted to the schools of the district where the child resides and who is residing with a resident of this state with whom the child has been placed for adoption shall be admitted to the schools of the district where the child resides unless either of the following applies: (a) The placement for adoption has been terminated. (b) Another school district is required to admit the child under division (B)(1) of this section. (4)(a) A child who does not reside in the district where the child's parent resides is not required to be admitted to the schools of the district in which the child resides if both of the following apply: (i) The child resides in a home, or in a facility similarly licensed in another state, and the child was placed in the home or facility by the child's parent in consultation with, and upon the recommendation of, the Ohio resilience through integrated systems and excellence program for children and youth involved in multiple state systems. (ii) The home provides education services that meet the minimum education standards under division (D)(2) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code or, in the case of a facility located in another state, meets substantially similar requirements of the jurisdiction where the facility is located, except that the home or facility may provide the child with less than the minimum number of instructional hours required only as necessary to accommodate the child's treatment program. (b) Upon a child's admission to a home pursuant to division (B)(4)(a) of this section, the home shall notify the district where the child's parent resides and the district where the home is located that the home is providing educational services to the child until the child is discharged. Upon a child's admission to a facility located in another state pursuant to division (B)(4)(a) of this section, the facility shall notify the district where the child's parent resides that the facility is providing educational services to the child until the child is discharged. In either case, the district where the child's parent resides shall continue to enroll the student as provided in division (C)(5) of this section and shall excuse the child from attendance until the child is discharged from the home or facility. (c) Upon a child's discharge from a home or facility, the home or facility shall notify the district where the child's parent resides. The home or facility and the district shall collaborate on a supportive reentry plan into school for the child. Division (B) of this section does not prohibit the board of education of a school district from placing a child with a disability who resides in the district in a special education program outside of the district or its schools in compliance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code. (C) A district shall not charge tuition for children admitted under division (B)(1) or (3) of this section. If the district admits a child under division (B)(2) of this section, tuition shall be paid to the district that admits the child as provided in divisions (C)(1) to (3) of this section, unless division (C)(4) of this section applies to the child: (1) If the child receives special education in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, the school district of residence, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, shall pay tuition for the child in accordance with section 3323.091, 3323.13, 3323.14, or 3323.141 of the Revised Code regardless of who has custody of the child or whether the child resides in a home. (2) For a child that does not receive special education in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, except as otherwise provided in division (C)(2)(d) of this section, if the child is in the permanent or legal custody of a government agency or person other than the child's parent, tuition shall be paid by: (a) The district in which the child's parent resided at the time the court removed the child from home or at the time the court vested legal or permanent custody of the child in the person or government agency, whichever occurred first; (b) If the parent's residence at the time the court removed the child from home or placed the child in the legal or permanent custody of the person or government agency is unknown, tuition shall be paid by the district in which the child resided at the time the child was removed from home or placed in legal or permanent custody, whichever occurred first; (c) If a school district cannot be established under division (C)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, tuition shall be paid by the district determined as required by section 2151.362 of the Revised Code by the court at the time it vests custody of the child in the person or government agency; (d) If at the time the court removed the child from home or vested legal or permanent custody of the child in the person or government agency, whichever occurred first, one parent was in a residential or correctional facility or a juvenile residential placement and the other parent, if living and not in such a facility or placement, was not known to reside in this state, tuition shall be paid by the district determined under division (D) of section 3313.65 of the Revised Code as the district required to pay any tuition while the parent was in such facility or placement; (e) If the department of education and workforce has determined, pursuant to division (A)(2) of section 2151.362 of the Revised Code, that a school district other than the one named in the court's initial order, or in a prior determination of the department, is responsible to bear the cost of educating the child, the district so determined shall be responsible for that cost. (3) If the child is not in the permanent or legal custody of a government agency or person other than the child's parent and the child resides in a home, tuition shall be paid by one of the following: (a) The school district in which the child's parent resides; (b) If the child's parent is not a resident of this state, the home in which the child resides. (4) Division (C)(4) of this section applies to any child who is admitted to a school district under division (B)(2) of this section, resides in a home that is not a foster home, a home maintained by the department of youth services, a detention facility established under section 2152.41 of the Revised Code, or a juvenile facility established under section 2151.65 of the Revised Code, and receives educational services at the home or facility in which the child resides pursuant to a contract between the home or facility and the school district providing those services. If a child to whom division (C)(4) of this section applies is a special education student, a district may choose whether to receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section or to receive a payment for that child under section 3323.14 of the Revised Code. If a district chooses to receive a payment for that child under section 3323.14 of the Revised Code, it shall not receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section. If a child to whom division (C)(4) of this section applies is not a special education student, a district shall receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section. In the case of a child to which division (C)(4) of this section applies, the total educational cost to be paid for the child shall be determined by a formula approved by the department of education and workforce, which formula shall be designed to calculate a per diem cost for the educational services provided to the child for each day the child is served and shall reflect the total actual cost incurred in providing those services. The department shall certify the total educational cost to be paid for the child to both the school district providing the educational services and, if different, the school district that is responsible to pay tuition for the child. The department shall deduct the certified amount from the state basic aid funds payable under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code to the district responsible to pay tuition and shall pay that amount to the district providing the educational services to the child. (5) In the case of a child to whom division (B)(4) of this section applies, and except as otherwise provided in division (C)(5)(f) of this section, tuition shall be paid to the home or facility for educational services provided to the child by the school district in which the child's parent resides according to the following: (a) The total educational cost to be paid for the child shall be determined by a formula approved by the department of education and workforce. The department shall design the formula to calculate a per diem cost for the educational services provided to the child for each day the child is served and shall reflect the total actual cost incurred in providing those services. The department shall certify the total educational cost to be paid for the child to both the home or facility providing the educational services and the district that is responsible to pay the tuition for the child. The department shall deduct the certified amount from the state basic aid funds payable under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code to the district responsible to pay tuition and shall pay that amount to the home or facility providing the educational services to the child. (b) The district responsible to pay tuition shall continue to report the child in its enrollment for purposes of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (c) If the parent's residence changes to a different school district while the child resides in the home or facility, the department of education and workforce may re-determine the school district responsible for tuition based on evidence provided by the district currently responsible for tuition. (d) Upon a child's discharge from the home or facility, the home or facility shall immediately notify the district where the child's parent resides and the department of education and workforce. The notification shall include a certified transcript of all coursework completed by the child while residing in the home or facility. The district where the child's parent resides shall accept all coursework completed by the child while in the home or facility and shall award credit for that coursework in accordance with district policy. (e) Following discharge from the home or facility and return to the parent's residence, high school students shall meet requirements under section 3313.618 of the Revised Code in order to qualify for a high school diploma that are no more stringent than those that apply to students who enroll into an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school after receiving a home education under section 3321.042 of the Revised Code. (f) If the child is provided educational services by a chartered nonpublic school while residing in a home and the child has been awarded a scholarship under a state scholarship program, as defined in section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, no school district shall be responsible for paying tuition under division (C)(5) of this section. (D) Tuition required to be paid under divisions (C)(2) and (3)(a) of this section shall be computed in accordance with section 3317.08 of the Revised Code. Tuition required to be paid under division (C)(3)(b) of this section shall be computed in accordance with section 3317.081 of the Revised Code. If a home fails to pay the tuition required by division (C)(3)(b) of this section, the board of education providing the education may recover in a civil action the tuition and the expenses incurred in prosecuting the action, including court costs and reasonable attorney's fees. If the prosecuting attorney or city director of law represents the board in such action, costs and reasonable attorney's fees awarded by the court, based upon the prosecuting attorney's, director's, or one of their designee's time spent preparing and presenting the case, shall be deposited in the county or city general fund. (E) A board of education may enroll a child free of any tuition obligation for a period not to exceed sixty days, on the sworn statement of an adult resident of the district that the resident has initiated legal proceedings for custody of the child. (F) In the case of any individual entitled to attend school under this division, no tuition shall be charged by the school district of attendance and no other school district shall be required to pay tuition for the individual's attendance. Notwithstanding division (B), (C), or (E) of this section: (1) All persons at least eighteen but under twenty-two years of age who live apart from their parents, support themselves by their own labor, and have not successfully completed the high school curriculum or the individualized education program developed for the person by the high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code, are entitled to attend school in the district in which they reside. (2) Any child under eighteen years of age who is married is entitled to attend school in the child's district of residence. (3) A child is entitled to attend school in the district in which either of the child's parents is employed if the child has a medical condition that may require emergency medical attention. The parent of a child entitled to attend school under division (F)(3) of this section shall submit to the board of education of the district in which the parent is employed a statement from the child's physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner certifying that the child's medical condition may require emergency medical attention. The statement shall be supported by such other evidence as the board may require. (4) Any child residing with a person other than the child's parent is entitled, for a period not to exceed twelve months, to attend school in the district in which that person resides if the child's parent files an affidavit with the superintendent of the district in which the person with whom the child is living resides stating all of the following: (a) That the parent is serving outside of the state in the armed services of the United States; (b) That the parent intends to reside in the district upon returning to this state; (c) The name and address of the person with whom the child is living while the parent is outside the state. (5) Any child under the age of twenty-two years who, after the death of a parent, resides in a school district other than the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parent's death is entitled to continue to attend school in the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parent's death for the remainder of the school year, subject to approval of that district board. (6) A child under the age of twenty-two years who resides with a parent who is having a new house built in a school district outside the district where the parent is residing is entitled to attend school for a period of time in the district where the new house is being built. In order to be entitled to such attendance, the parent shall provide the district superintendent with the following: (a) A sworn statement explaining the situation, revealing the location of the house being built, and stating the parent's intention to reside there upon its completion; (b) A statement from the builder confirming that a new house is being built for the parent and that the house is at the location indicated in the parent's statement. (7) A child under the age of twenty-two years residing with a parent who has a contract to purchase a house in a school district outside the district where the parent is residing and who is waiting upon the date of closing of the mortgage loan for the purchase of such house is entitled to attend school for a period of time in the district where the house is being purchased. In order to be entitled to such attendance, the parent shall provide the district superintendent with the following: (a) A sworn statement explaining the situation, revealing the location of the house being purchased, and stating the parent's intent to reside there; (b) A statement from a real estate broker or bank officer confirming that the parent has a contract to purchase the house, that the parent is waiting upon the date of closing of the mortgage loan, and that the house is at the location indicated in the parent's statement. The district superintendent shall establish a period of time not to exceed ninety days during which the child entitled to attend school under division (F)(6) or (7) of this section may attend without tuition obligation. A student attending a school under division (F)(6) or (7) of this section shall be eligible to participate in interscholastic athletics under the auspices of that school, provided the board of education of the school district where the student's parent resides, by a formal action, releases the student to participate in interscholastic athletics at the school where the student is attending, and provided the student receives any authorization required by a public agency or private organization of which the school district is a member exercising authority over interscholastic sports. (8) A child whose parent is a full-time employee of a city, local, or exempted village school district, or of an educational service center, may be admitted to the schools of the district where the child's parent is employed, or in the case of a child whose parent is employed by an educational service center, in the district that serves the location where the parent's job is primarily located, provided the district board of education establishes such an admission policy by resolution adopted by a majority of its members. Any such policy shall take effect on the first day of the school year and the effective date of any amendment or repeal may not be prior to the first day of the subsequent school year. The policy shall be uniformly applied to all such children and shall provide for the admission of any such child upon request of the parent. No child may be admitted under this policy after the first day of classes of any school year. (9) A child who is with the child's parent under the care of a shelter for victims of domestic violence, as defined in section 3113.33 of the Revised Code, is entitled to attend school free in the district in which the child is with the child's parent, and no other school district shall be required to pay tuition for the child's attendance in that school district. The enrollment of a child in a school district under this division shall not be denied due to a delay in the school district's receipt of any records required under section 3313.672 of the Revised Code or any other records required for enrollment. Any days of attendance and any credits earned by a child while enrolled in a school district under this division shall be transferred to and accepted by any school district in which the child subsequently enrolls. The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules to ensure compliance with this division. (10) Any child under the age of twenty-two years whose parent has moved out of the school district after the commencement of classes in the child's senior year of high school is entitled, subject to the approval of that district board, to attend school in the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parental move for the remainder of the school year and for one additional semester or equivalent term. A district board may also adopt a policy specifying extenuating circumstances under which a student may continue to attend school under division (F)(10) of this section for an additional period of time in order to successfully complete the high school curriculum for the individualized education program developed for the student by the high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code. (11) As used in this division, "grandparent" means a parent of a parent of a child. A child under the age of twenty-two years who is in the custody of the child's parent, resides with a grandparent, and does not require special education is entitled to attend the schools of the district in which the child's grandparent resides, provided that, prior to such attendance in any school year, the board of education of the school district in which the child's grandparent resides and the board of education of the school district in which the child's parent resides enter into a written agreement specifying that good cause exists for such attendance, describing the nature of this good cause, and consenting to such attendance. In lieu of a consent form signed by a parent, a board of education may request the grandparent of a child attending school in the district in which the grandparent resides pursuant to division (F)(11) of this section to complete any consent form required by the district, including any authorization required by sections 3313.712, 3313.713, 3313.716, and 3313.718 of the Revised Code. Upon request, the grandparent shall complete any consent form required by the district. A school district shall not incur any liability solely because of its receipt of a consent form from a grandparent in lieu of a parent. Division (F)(11) of this section does not create, and shall not be construed as creating, a new cause of action or substantive legal right against a school district, a member of a board of education, or an employee of a school district. This section does not affect, and shall not be construed as affecting, any immunities from defenses to tort liability created or recognized by Chapter 2744. of the Revised Code for a school district, member, or employee. (12) A child under the age of twenty-two years is entitled to attend school in a school district other than the district in which the child is entitled to attend school under division (B), (C), or (E) of this section provided that, prior to such attendance in any school year, both of the following occur: (a) The superintendent of the district in which the child is entitled to attend school under division (B), (C), or (E) of this section contacts the superintendent of another district for purposes of this division; (b) The superintendents of both districts enter into a written agreement that consents to the attendance and specifies that the purpose of such attendance is to protect the student's physical or mental well-being or to deal with other extenuating circumstances deemed appropriate by the superintendents. While an agreement is in effect under this division for a student who is not receiving special education under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code and notwithstanding Chapter 3327. of the Revised Code, the board of education of neither school district involved in the agreement is required to provide transportation for the student to and from the school where the student attends. A student attending a school of a district pursuant to this division shall be allowed to participate in all student activities, including interscholastic athletics, at the school where the student is attending on the same basis as any student who has always attended the schools of that district while of compulsory school age. (13) All school districts shall comply with the "McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act," 42 U.S.C.A. 11431 et seq., for the education of homeless children. Each city, local, and exempted village school district shall comply with the requirements of that act governing the provision of a free, appropriate public education, including public preschool, to each homeless child. When a child loses permanent housing and becomes a homeless person, as defined in 42 U.S.C.A. 11481(5), or when a child who is such a homeless person changes temporary living arrangements, the child's parent or guardian shall have the option of enrolling the child in either of the following: (a) The child's school of origin, as defined in 42 U.S.C.A. 11432(g)(3)(C); (b) The school that is operated by the school district in which the shelter where the child currently resides is located and that serves the geographic area in which the shelter is located. (14) A child under the age of twenty-two years who resides with a person other than the child's parent is entitled to attend school in the school district in which that person resides if both of the following apply: (a) That person has been appointed, through a military power of attorney executed under section 574(a) of the "National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 1994," 107 Stat. 1674 (1993), 10 U.S.C. 1044b, or through a comparable document necessary to complete a family care plan, as the parent's agent for the care, custody, and control of the child while the parent is on active duty as a member of the national guard or a reserve unit of the armed forces of the United States or because the parent is a member of the armed forces of the United States and is on a duty assignment away from the parent's residence. (b) The military power of attorney or comparable document includes at least the authority to enroll the child in school. The entitlement to attend school in the district in which the parent's agent under the military power of attorney or comparable document resides applies until the end of the school year in which the military power of attorney or comparable document expires. (G) A board of education, after approving admission, may waive tuition for students who will temporarily reside in the district and who are either of the following: (1) Residents or domiciliaries of a foreign nation who request admission as foreign exchange students; (2) Residents or domiciliaries of the United States but not of Ohio who request admission as participants in an exchange program operated by a student exchange organization. (H) Pursuant to sections 3311.211, 3313.90, 3319.01, 3323.04, 3327.04, and 3327.06 of the Revised Code, a child may attend school or participate in a special education program in a school district other than in the district where the child is entitled to attend school under division (B) of this section. (I)(1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code, a child under twenty-two years of age may attend school in the school district in which the child, at the end of the first full week of October of the school year, was entitled to attend school as otherwise provided under this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code, if at that time the child was enrolled in the schools of the district but since that time the child or the child's parent has relocated to a new address located outside of that school district and within the same county as the child's or parent's address immediately prior to the relocation. The child may continue to attend school in the district, and at the school to which the child was assigned at the end of the first full week of October of the current school year, for the balance of the school year. Division (I)(1) of this section applies only if both of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) The board of education of the school district in which the child was entitled to attend school at the end of the first full week in October and of the district to which the child or child's parent has relocated each has adopted a policy to enroll children described in division (I)(1) of this section. (b) The child's parent provides written notification of the relocation outside of the school district to the superintendent of each of the two school districts. (2) At the beginning of the school year following the school year in which the child or the child's parent relocated outside of the school district as described in division (I)(1) of this section, the child is not entitled to attend school in the school district under that division. (3) Any person or entity owing tuition to the school district on behalf of the child at the end of the first full week in October, as provided in division (C) of this section, shall continue to owe such tuition to the district for the child's attendance under division (I)(1) of this section for the lesser of the balance of the school year or the balance of the time that the child attends school in the district under division (I)(1) of this section. (4) A pupil who may attend school in the district under division (I)(1) of this section shall be entitled to transportation services pursuant to an agreement between the district and the district in which the child or child's parent has relocated unless the districts have not entered into such agreement, in which case the child shall be entitled to transportation services in the same manner as a pupil attending school in the district under interdistrict open enrollment as described in division (E)(B) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the district has adopted an open enrollment policy as described in division (B)(1)(b) or (c) of section 3313.98 of the Revised Code. (J) This division does not apply to a child receiving special education. A school district required to pay tuition pursuant to division (C)(2) or (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code shall have an amount deducted under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code equal to its own tuition rate for the same period of attendance. A school district entitled to receive tuition pursuant to division (C)(2) or (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code shall have an amount credited under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code equal to its own tuition rate for the same period of attendance. If the tuition rate credited to the district of attendance exceeds the rate deducted from the district required to pay tuition, the department of education and workforce shall pay the district of attendance the difference from amounts deducted from all districts' payments under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code but not credited to other school districts under such division and from appropriations made for such purpose. The treasurer of each school district shall, by the fifteenth day of January and July, furnish the director of education and workforce a report of the names of each child who attended the district's schools under divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code during the preceding six calendar months, the duration of the attendance of those children, the school district responsible for tuition on behalf of the child, and any other information that the director requires. Upon receipt of the report the director, pursuant to division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, shall deduct each district's tuition obligations under divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code and pay to the district of attendance that amount plus any amount required to be paid by the state. (K) In the event of a disagreement, the director of education and workforce shall determine the school district in which the parent resides. (L) Nothing in this section requires or authorizes, or shall be construed to require or authorize, the admission to a public school in this state of a pupil who has been permanently excluded from public school attendance by the director pursuant to sections 3301.121 and 3313.662 of the Revised Code. (M) In accordance with division (B)(1) of this section, a child whose parent is a member of the national guard or a reserve unit of the armed forces of the United States and is called to active duty, or a child whose parent is a member of the armed forces of the United States and is ordered to a temporary duty assignment outside of the district, may continue to attend school in the district in which the child's parent lived before being called to active duty or ordered to a temporary duty assignment outside of the district, as long as the child's parent continues to be a resident of that district, and regardless of where the child lives as a result of the parent's active duty status or temporary duty assignment. However, the district is not responsible for providing transportation for the child if the child lives outside of the district as a result of the parent's active duty status or temporary duty assignment. Sec. 3313.646. (A) As used in this section: (1) "All-day preschool" means a preschool program that is in session for not less than the same number of clock hours each week as for students in grades kindergarten through six. (2) "Half-day preschool" means a preschool program that is in session for not less than half of the number of clock hours each week as for students in grades kindergarten through six. (B)(1) The board of education of a each city, exempted village, or local school district, except a cooperative education district established pursuant to section 3311.521 of the Revised Code, may establish and shall operate a half-day preschool program to provide services to preschool-age for children, provided the board has demonstrated a need for the program four and five years of age and who are not enrolled in kindergarten. Each board shall determine the number of days a preschool program will meet each week to meet the minimum number of clock hours required for the program. A board may use school funds in support of preschool programs. A board may charge tuition for its preschool program in accordance with section 3317.083 of the Revised Code. The board shall maintain, operate, and admit children to any such program pursuant to rules adopted by such board and the rules adopted under sections 3301.52 to 3301.57 3301.59 of the Revised Code. A board of education may establish fees or tuition, which may be graduated in proportion to family income, for participation in a preschool program. In cases where payment of fees or tuition would create a hardship for the child's parent or guardian, the board may waive any such fees or tuition. (2) Each school district shall designate either the first day of August or the thirtieth day of September of each year as the date by which a child must be four years of age to enroll in the district's preschool program. Each school district shall display the designated date on the district's web site or otherwise provide the designated date to parents or guardians seeking to enroll a child in the district's preschool program. A child is eligible to enroll in a school district's preschool program if, on the date designated by the school district in the year of enrollment, the child either: (a) Is four years of age and the child's parent or guardian intends to enroll the child in kindergarten at five years of age; (b) Is five years of age and the child's parent or guardian intends to enroll the child in kindergarten at six years of age. If a child enrolls in a preschool program at four years of age with the intention to enroll in kindergarten at five years of age, but the child's parent or guardian and the school district in which the child attends preschool determine that the child is not ready to enter kindergarten at five years of age, then the school district shall permit the child to enroll in a second year of preschool. (3) School districts may offer any of the following: (a) Preschool enrollment for children three years of age; (b) Multiple years of preschool enrollment to children three or four years of age; (c) An all-day preschool program. (B)(C) No board of education that is not receiving funds under the "Head Start Act," 95 Stat. 489 (1981), 42 U.S.C.A. 9831, on March 17, 1989, shall compete for funds under the "Head Start Act" with any grantee receiving funds under that act. (C)(D) A board of education may contract with any of the following preschool providers to provide services to preschool-age children, other than those services for which the district is eligible to receive funding under section 3317.0213 of the Revised Code: (1) Any organization receiving funds under the "Head Start Act"; (2) Any nonsectarian eligible nonpublic school as defined in division (H) of section 3301.52 of the Revised Code; (3) Any child care provider licensed under Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code. Boards may contract to provide services to preschool-age children only with such organizations whose staff meet the requirements of rules adopted under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code or those of the child development associate credential established by the national association for the education of young children. (D)(E) A contract entered into under division (C)(D) of this section may provide for the board of education to lease school facilities to the preschool provider or to furnish transportation, utilities, or staff for the preschool program. (E)(F) The treasurer of any board of education operating a preschool program pursuant to this section shall keep an account of all funds used to operate the program in the same manner as the treasurer would any other funds of the district pursuant to this chapter. Sec. 3313.6415. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Eligible operator" means any of the following: (a) The board of education of a city, exempted village, or local school district that is adjacent to a school district seeking to outsource its preschool program; (b) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code that meets all of the following: (i) The community school's operator as defined in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code is a nonprofit organization; (ii) The community school is not under an exemption or waiver from any department of education and workforce oversight, ratings, or regulations; (iii) The community school is not under an exemption or waiver from the permanent closure criteria under section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. (c) A STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; (d) An eligible nonpublic school, as defined in section 3301.52 of the Revised Code, that does not have a religious affiliation; (e) An organization operated by a county, municipal corporation, or subdivision of a municipal corporation; (f) A child care center, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code, that is either of the following: (i) Operated by a secular nonprofit organization; (ii) Operated by a secular for-profit organization and the child care center's preschool program has received a step up to quality rating of four stars or higher under section 5104.29 of the Revised Code. (2) "Qualifying preschool program" means an existing preschool program licensed under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code or an existing child care center licensed under section 5104.02 of the Revised Code that offers preschool programming that meets both of the following: (a) The preschool program or child care center is operated by an eligible operator; (b) The preschool program or child care center meets either of the following: (i) The preschool program or child care center is located within the school district and has received a step up to quality rating of three stars or higher under section 5104.29 of the Revised Code or an equivalent rating under division (D) of this section; (ii) The preschool program or child care center is located within an adjacent school district and has received a step up to quality rating of four stars or higher under section 5104.29 of the Revised Code or an equivalent rating under division (D) of this section. (B) In lieu of operating a preschool program under section 3313.646 of the Revised Code, the board of education of a city, exempted village, or local school district may contract with one or more qualifying preschool programs to offer a preschool program on behalf of the school district or to offer a joint preschool program. A preschool program operated under this section shall comply with the requirements in sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under those sections. A board shall administer the enrollment process for a preschool program operated under this section. A board may charge tuition for a preschool program operated under this section. If a board charges tuition, it shall do so under section 3317.083 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) Prior to entering into a contract under this section, the district board shall do the following: (a) Hold a public hearing and adopt a resolution outlining the district's rules for outsourcing a preschool program or forming a joint preschool program; (b) After adopting such a resolution, hold a public hearing during which the prospective eligible operator shall give a presentation on the eligible operator's preschool program and answer questions from attendees. (2) A district board that has outsourced its preschool program shall hold a public hearing and adopt a resolution to renew or update its preschool outsourcing rules at least every two years. (D) The department of children and youth shall develop a rating system using identical components and rating standards to the step up to quality program created under section 5104.29 of the Revised Code. The department shall develop and administer a process under which preschool programs and child care centers may request a rating for the purpose of becoming a qualifying preschool program under this section. Sec. 3313.842. (A) The boards of education or governing authorities of any two or more school districts or community schools may enter into an agreement for joint or cooperative establishment and operation of any educational program including any class, course, or program that may be included in a school district's or community school's graded course of study and staff development programs for teaching and nonteaching school employees. Each school district or community school that is party to such an agreement may contribute funds of the district or school in support of the agreement and for the establishment and operation of any educational program established under the agreement. The agreement shall designate one of the districts or community schools as responsible for receiving and disbursing the funds contributed by the parties to the agreement. (B) Notwithstanding sections 3313.48 and 3313.64 of the Revised Code, any school district that is party to an agreement for joint or cooperative establishment and operation of an educational program may charge fees or tuition for students who participate in the program and are entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in division (G) of section 3321.01 of the Revised Code, no community school that is party to the agreement shall charge fees or tuition for students who participate in the program and are reported by the school under division (B) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3313.98. Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3311.19 and division (D) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code, the provisions of this section and sections 3313.981 to 3313.983 of the Revised Code that apply to a city school district do not apply to a joint vocational or cooperative education school district unless expressly specified. (A) As used in this section and sections 3313.981 to 3313.983 of the Revised Code: (1) "Parent" means either of the natural or adoptive parents of a student, except under the following conditions: (a) When the marriage of the natural or adoptive parents of the student has been terminated by a divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment or the natural or adoptive parents of the student are living separate and apart under a legal separation decree and the court has issued an order allocating the parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the student, "parent" means the residential parent as designated by the court except that "parent" means either parent when the court issues a shared parenting decree. (b) When a court has granted temporary or permanent custody of the student to an individual or agency other than either of the natural or adoptive parents of the student, "parent" means the legal custodian of the child. (c) When a court has appointed a guardian for the student, "parent" means the guardian of the student. (2) "Native student" means a student entitled under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code to attend school in a district adopting a resolution under this section. (3) "Adjacent district" means a city, exempted village, or local school district having territory that abuts the territory of a district adopting a resolution under this section. (4) "Adjacent district student" means a student entitled under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code to attend school in an adjacent district. (5) "Adjacent district joint vocational student" means an adjacent district student who enrolls in a city, exempted village, or local school district pursuant to this section and who also enrolls in a joint vocational school district that does not contain the territory of the district for which that student is a native student and does contain the territory of the city, exempted village, or local district in which the student enrolls. (6) "Poverty line" means the poverty line established by the director of the United States office of management and budget as revised by the secretary of health and human services in accordance with section 673(2) of the "Community Services Block Grant Act," 95 Stat. 1609, 42 U.S.C.A. 9902, as amended. (7) "IEP" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Other district" means a city, exempted village, or local school district having territory outside of the territory of a district adopting a resolution under this section. (9) "Other district student" means a student entitled under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code to attend school in an other district. (10) "Other district joint vocational student" means a student who is enrolled in any city, exempted village, or local school district and who also enrolls in a joint vocational school district that does not contain the territory of the district for which that student is a native student in accordance with a policy adopted under section 3313.983 of the Revised Code. (11) "Active duty member" means a member of the armed forces of the United States who is on full-time duty. (12) "Armed forces" means the United States army, navy, air force, space force, marine corps, and coast guard. (13) "Preschool program" has the same meaning as in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Subject to division (I) of this section, the board of education of each city, local, and exempted village school district shall adopt a resolution establishing for the school district one of the following policies: (a) A policy that entirely prohibits the enrollment of students from adjacent districts or other districts, other than students for whom tuition is paid in accordance with section 3317.08 of the Revised Code; (b) A policy that permits enrollment of students from all adjacent districts in accordance with policy statements contained in the resolution; (c) A policy that permits enrollment of students from all other districts in accordance with policy statements contained in the resolution. (2) A policy permitting enrollment of students from adjacent or from other districts, as applicable, shall provide for all of the following: (a) Application procedures, including deadlines for application and for notification of students and the superintendent of the applicable district whenever an adjacent or other district student's application is approved. (b) Procedures for admitting adjacent or other district applicants free of any tuition obligation to the district's schools, including, but not limited to: (i) The establishment of district capacity limits by grade level, school building, and education program; (ii) A requirement that all native students wishing to be enrolled in the district will be enrolled and that any adjacent or other district students previously enrolled in the district shall receive preference over first-time applicants; (iii) Procedures to ensure that an appropriate racial balance is maintained in the district schools. (C) Except as provided in section 3313.982 of the Revised Code, the procedures for admitting adjacent or other district students, as applicable, shall not include: (1) Any requirement of academic ability, or any level of athletic, artistic, or other extracurricular skills; (2) Limitations on admitting applicants because of disability, except that a board may refuse to admit a student receiving services under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, if the services described in the student's IEP are not available in the district's schools; (3) A requirement that the student be proficient in the English language; (4) Rejection of any applicant because the student has been subject to disciplinary proceedings, except that if an applicant has been suspended or expelled by the student's district for ten consecutive days or more in the term for which admission is sought or in the term immediately preceding the term for which admission is sought, the procedures may include a provision denying admission of such applicant. (D)(1) Each school board permitting only enrollment of adjacent district students shall provide information about the policy adopted under this section, including the application procedures and deadlines, to the superintendent and the board of education of each adjacent district and, upon request, to the parent of any adjacent district student. (2) Each school board permitting enrollment of other district students shall provide information about the policy adopted under this section, including the application procedures and deadlines, upon request, to the board of education of any other school district or to the parent of any student anywhere in the state. (E) Any school board shall accept all credits toward graduation earned in adjacent or other district schools by an adjacent or other district student or a native student. (F)(1) No board of education may adopt a policy discouraging or prohibiting its native students from applying to enroll in the schools of an adjacent or any other district that has adopted a policy permitting such enrollment, except that a district may object to the enrollment of a native student in an adjacent or other district in order to maintain an appropriate racial balance. (2) If a board objects to enrollment of native students under this division, any adjacent or other district shall refuse to enroll such native students unless tuition is paid for the students in accordance with section 3317.08 of the Revised Code. An adjacent or other district enrolling such students may not receive funding for those students in accordance with section 3313.981 of the Revised Code. (G) The department of education and workforce shall monitor school districts to ensure compliance with this section and the districts' policies. The department may adopt rules requiring uniform application procedures, deadlines for application, notification procedures, and record-keeping requirements for all school boards that adopt policies permitting the enrollment of adjacent or other district students, as applicable. If the department adopts such rules, no school board shall adopt a policy that conflicts with those rules. (H) A resolution adopted by a board of education under this section that entirely prohibits the enrollment of students from adjacent and from other school districts does not abrogate any agreement entered into under section 3313.841 or 3313.92 of the Revised Code or any contract entered into under section 3313.90 of the Revised Code between the board of education adopting the resolution and the board of education of any adjacent or other district or prohibit these boards of education from entering into any such agreement or contract. (I) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section or section 3313.981 of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) A policy adopted by a city, exempted village, or local school district board of education under division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section shall permit any student who is not a native student of the district to enroll in the district if both of the following apply: (a) The student's parent is an active duty member of the armed forces stationed in the state. (b) The student's parent provides to the district a copy of the parent's official written order verifying the parent's status as an active duty member of the armed forces. (2) In enrolling a student pursuant to division (I) of this section, a district shall comply with procedures prescribed under divisions (B)(2) and (C) of this section, except as provided in division (I)(6) of this section. In addition, the district shall not require tuition to be paid for the student's enrollment in the district. (3) A student who, pursuant to this division, enrolls in a district that has adopted a policy under division (B)(1)(a) of this section and who is not a native student of that district shall, for the purposes of sections 3313.981, 3315.18, 3317.03, and 3318.011 of the Revised Code, be considered as an "other district student" who enrolls in a district that has adopted a policy under division (B)(1)(c) of this section. Such student also shall receive transportation services under section 3313.981 of the Revised Code in the same manner as an "other district student." (4) A student who, pursuant to this division, enrolls in a district that has adopted a policy under division (B)(1)(b) of this section and who is not a native student of the district or an adjacent district shall, nevertheless, be considered an "adjacent district student" for the purposes of sections 3313.981, 3315.18, and 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (5) A student who, pursuant to this division, enrolls in a district that has adopted a policy under division (B)(1)(b) of this section and whose parent is subsequently discharged or released from active duty shall be permitted to attend school in that district and receive transportation services under section 3313.981 of the Revised Code in the same manner as an "other district student" for the remainder of the school year in which the parent is discharged or released from active duty. After the conclusion of that school year, that student shall not be eligible under this division, as long as the student does not have a parent on active duty. (6) A school district that enrolls a student under division (I) of this section, or that enrolls a student described in division (I)(1) of this section under division (B)(1)(c) of this section, shall not require the student to comply with any application deadline established under division (B)(2) of this section. (J) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit or require the board of education of a city, exempted village, or local school district to exclude any native student of the district from enrolling in the district. Sec. 3313.981. (A) The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules requiring all of the following: (1) The board of education of each city, exempted village, and local school district to annually report to the department all of the following: (a) The number of adjacent district or other district students in grades kindergarten through twelve, as applicable, the number of adjacent district or other district students who are enrolled in a preschool children with disabilities program operated by the district, as applicable, and the number of adjacent district or other district joint vocational students, as applicable, enrolled in the district, in accordance with a policy adopted under division (B) of section 3313.98 of the Revised Code; (b) The number of native students in grades kindergarten through twelve enrolled in adjacent or other districts and the number of native students who are enrolled in a preschool children with disabilities enrolled in program operated by the adjacent or other districts, in accordance with a policy adopted under division (B) of section 3313.98 of the Revised Code; (c) Each adjacent district or other district student's or adjacent district or other district joint vocational student's date of enrollment in the district; (d) The full-time equivalent number of adjacent district or other district students enrolled in each of the categories of career-technical education programs or classes described in section 3317.014 of the Revised Code; (e) Each native student's date of enrollment in an adjacent or other district. (2) The board of education of each joint vocational school district to annually report to the department all of the following: (a) The number of adjacent district or other district joint vocational students, as applicable, enrolled in the district; (b) The full-time equivalent number of adjacent district or other district joint vocational students enrolled in each category of career-technical education programs or classes described in section 3317.014 of the Revised Code; (c) For each adjacent district or other district joint vocational student, the city, exempted village, or local school district in which the student is also enrolled. (3) Prior to the end of each reporting period specified in section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, the superintendent of each city, local, or exempted village school district that admits adjacent district or other district students who are in grades kindergarten through twelve, adjacent district or other district students who are enrolled in a preschool children with disabilities program operated by the district, or adjacent district or other district joint vocational students in accordance with a policy adopted under division (B) of section 3313.98 of the Revised Code to report to the department each adjacent or other district's students and where those students who are enrolled in the superintendent's district under the policy are entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. The rules shall provide for the method of counting students who are enrolled for part of a school year in an adjacent or other district or as an adjacent district or other district joint vocational student. (B) From the payments made to a city, exempted village, or local school district under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code and, if necessary, from the payments made to the district under sections 321.24 and 323.156 of the Revised Code, the department shall annually subtract, for each native student who is a preschool child with a disability reported under division (A)(1) of this section who is enrolled in an adjacent or other district pursuant to policies adopted by such a district under division (B) of section 3313.98 of the Revised Code, $4,000. (C) To the payments made to a city, exempted village, or local school district under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code, the department shall annually add, for each adjacent district or other district student who is a preschool child with a disability reported under division (A)(1) of this section who is enrolled in the district, $4,000. (D) No city, exempted village, or local school district shall receive a payment under division (C) of this section for a student if for the same school year that student is counted in the district's enrollment certified under section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (E) Upon request of a parent, and provided the board offers transportation to native students of the same grade level and distance from school under section 3327.01 of the Revised Code, a city, exempted village, or local school board enrolling an adjacent or other district student shall provide transportation for the student within the boundaries of the board's district, except that the board shall be required to pick up and drop off a nonhandicapped student only at a regular school bus stop designated in accordance with the board's transportation policy. Pursuant to rules of the department, such board may reimburse the parent from funds received for pupil transportation under section 3317.0212 of the Revised Code, or other provisions of law, for the reasonable cost of transportation from the student's home to the designated school bus stop if the student's family has an income below the federal poverty line. Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under this section shall be filed with the director of education and workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed contract filed with the director under this section. (A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school shall specify the following: (1) That the school shall be established as either of the following: (a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 2003; (b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. (2) The education program of the school, including the school's mission and educational philosophy, the characteristics of the students the school is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the focus of the curriculum; (3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those goals, which shall include the statewide achievement assessments; (4) Performance standards, including but not limited to all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the school will be evaluated by the sponsor; (5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised Code; (6)(a) Dismissal procedures; (b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the student. (7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; (8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of state. The contract shall require financial records of the school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 117.10 of the Revised Code. (9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities to be used that contains at least the following information: (a) A detailed description of each facility used for instructional purposes; (b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility that are paid by or on behalf of the school; (c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments that are paid by the school; (d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the operator, if any. (10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the following: (a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code, except that a community school may engage noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; (b) A prohibition against the school employing an individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in any position. (11) That the school will comply with the following requirements: (a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred twenty hours per school year. (b) The governing authority will purchase liability insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of the school. (c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or religious institution. (d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.46, 3319.90, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district and will comply with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code in the manner specified in section 3314.17 of the Revised Code. (e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 2921.42 of the Revised Code. (f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or (F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on subject area competency adopted by the department under divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall comply with the framework for granting units of high school credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency through work-based learning experiences, internships, or cooperative education developed by the department under division (J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. (g) The school governing authority will submit within four months after the end of each school year a report of its activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled in the school. (h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, the school will pay teachers based upon performance in accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (j) If the school operates a preschool program that is licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. (k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district unless it is either of the following: (i) An internet- or computer-based community school; (ii) A community school in which a majority of the enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. (l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the Revised Code. (m) The school will comply with section 3313.7118 of the Revised Code if it serves elementary school students. (12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits to employees; (13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division (D) of this section. (14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; (15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. (16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition of employees of the school in the event the contract is terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code; (17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all or part of an existing public school or educational service center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is a converted public school or service center building, both of the following: (a) Specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer that the board of education or service center governing board that operated the school or building before conversion is delegating to the governing authority of the community school with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining agreement applicable to such employees; (b) Alternative arrangements for current public school students who choose not to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not to teach in the school or building after conversion. (18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the governing authority of the community school; (19) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located. That policy shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: (a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located; (b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in districts adjacent to the district in which the school is located; (c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any other district in the state. (20) A provision recognizing the authority of the department to take over the sponsorship of the school in accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code; (21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; (22) A provision recognizing both of the following: (a) The authority of public health and safety officials to inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; (b) The authority of the department as the community school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such action. (23) A description of the learning opportunities that will be offered to students including both classroom-based and non-classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance with criteria for student participation established by the department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code; (24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall be taken by the sponsor of the school. (25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of September each school year, unless the mission of the school as specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. (26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; (27) That the school's attendance and participation policies will be available for public inspection; (28) That the school's attendance and participation records shall be made available to the department, auditor of state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of the Revised Code; (29) If a school operates using the blended learning model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all of the following information: (a) An indication of what blended learning model or models will be used; (b) A description of how student instructional needs will be determined and documented; (c) The method to be used for determining competency, granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; (d) The school's attendance requirements, including how the school will document participation in learning opportunities; (e) A statement describing how student progress will be monitored; (f) A statement describing how private student data will be protected; (g) A description of the professional development activities that will be offered to teachers. (30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear interest at a fair market rate; (31) A provision requiring that, if the governing authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity shall be independent from the operator with which the school has contracted. (32) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a student's parent to notify the community school in which the student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of the parent's or student's primary residence. (33) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a student residence and address verification policy for students enrolling in or attending the school. (34) A provision establishing the process by which the governing authority of the school will be selected in the future. (35) A description of the management and administration of the school. (36) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt policies and procedures to establish internal financial controls for the school. (B) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school may provide for the community school governing authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school receives from the state. (C) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code and shall include the following: (1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the contract; (2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal performance and the organization and operation of the community school on at least an annual basis; (3) Provide technical assistance to the community school in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the contract; (4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; (5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the event the community school experiences financial difficulties or closes prior to the end of a school year. (D) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the academic goals prescribed in the contract have been satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. (E) If a community school fails to open for operation within one year after the contract entered into under this section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A school shall not be considered permanently closed because the operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3314.08. (A) As used in this section: (1) "IEP" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Preschool program" has the same meaning as in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code. (3) "Resident district" means the school district in which a student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules requiring the governing authority of each community school established under this chapter to annually report all of the following: (1) The number of students enrolled in grades one through twelve and the full-time equivalent number of students enrolled in kindergarten in the school and a preschool operated by the school who are not receiving special education and related services pursuant to an IEP; (2) The number of enrolled students in grades one through twelve and the full-time equivalent number of enrolled students in kindergarten or a preschool operated by the school, who are receiving special education and related services pursuant to an IEP; (3) The number of students reported under division (B)(2) of this section receiving special education and related services pursuant to an IEP for a disability described in each of divisions (A) to (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (4) The full-time equivalent number of students reported under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section who are enrolled in career-technical education programs or classes described in each of divisions (A)(1) to (5) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code that are provided by the community school; (5) The number of students reported under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section who are not reported under division (B)(4) of this section but who are enrolled in career-technical education programs or classes described in each of divisions (A)(1) to (5) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code at a joint vocational school district or another district in the career-technical planning district to which the school is assigned; (6) The number of students reported under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section who are category one to three English learners described in each of divisions (A) to (C) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code; (7) The number of students reported under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section who are economically disadvantaged, as defined by the department. A student shall not be categorically excluded from the number reported under division (B)(7) of this section based on anything other than family income. (8) For each student, the city, exempted village, or local school district in which the student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (9) The number of students enrolled in a preschool program operated by the school that is licensed under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code who are not receiving special education and related services pursuant to an IEP. A school district board and a community school governing authority shall include in their respective reports under division (B) of this section any child admitted in accordance with division (A)(2) of section 3321.01 of the Revised Code. A governing authority of a community school shall not include in its report under divisions (B)(1) to (9)(8) of this section any student for whom tuition is charged under division (F) of this section. (C)(1)(a) If a community school's costs for a fiscal year for a student receiving special education and related services pursuant to an IEP for a disability described in divisions (B) to (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code exceed the threshold cost for serving the student as specified in division (B) of section 3317.0214 of the Revised Code, the school may submit to the director of education and workforce documentation, as prescribed by the director, of all its costs for that student. Upon submission of documentation for a student of the type and in the manner prescribed, the department shall pay to the community school an amount equal to the school's costs for the student in excess of the threshold costs. (b) The community school shall report under division (C)(1)(a) of this section, and the department shall pay for, only the costs of educational expenses and the related services provided to the student in accordance with the student's individualized education program. Any legal fees, court costs, or other costs associated with any cause of action relating to the student may not be included in the amount. (2) In any fiscal year, a community school receiving funds under division (A)(7) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code shall spend those funds only for the purposes that the department designates as approved for career-technical education expenses. Career-technical education expenses approved by the department shall include only expenses connected to the delivery of career-technical programming to career-technical students. The department shall require the school to report data annually so that the department may monitor the school's compliance with the requirements regarding the manner in which funding received under division (A)(7) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code may be spent. (3) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in section 3313.90 of the Revised Code, except as provided in division (C)(5) of this section, all funds received under division (A)(7) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code shall be spent in the following manner: (a) At least seventy-five per cent of the funds shall be spent on curriculum development, purchase, and implementation; instructional resources and supplies; industry-based program certification; student assessment, credentialing, and placement; curriculum specific equipment purchases and leases; career-technical student organization fees and expenses; home and agency linkages; work-based learning experiences; professional development; and other costs directly associated with career-technical education programs including development of new programs. (b) Not more than twenty-five per cent of the funds shall be used for personnel expenditures. (4) A community school shall spend the funds it receives under division (A)(4) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code in accordance with section 3317.25 of the Revised Code. (5) The department may waive the requirement in division (C)(3) of this section for any community school that exclusively provides one or more career-technical workforce development programs in arts and communications that are not equipment-intensive, as determined by the department. (6) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, a community school shall spend the funds it receives under division (A)(5) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code only for services for English learners. (D) A board of education sponsoring a community school may utilize local funds to make enhancement grants to the school or may agree, either as part of the contract or separately, to provide any specific services to the community school at no cost to the school. (E) A community school may not levy taxes or issue bonds secured by tax revenues. (F) No community school shall charge tuition for the enrollment of any student who is a resident of this state. A community school may charge tuition for the enrollment of any student who is not a resident of this state. (G)(1)(a) A community school may borrow money to pay any necessary and actual expenses of the school in anticipation of the receipt of any portion of the payments to be received by the school pursuant to section 3317.022 of the Revised Code. The school may issue notes to evidence such borrowing. The proceeds of the notes shall be used only for the purposes for which the anticipated receipts may be lawfully expended by the school. (b) A school may also borrow money for a term not to exceed fifteen years for the purpose of acquiring facilities. (2) The state is not liable for debt incurred by the governing authority of a community school. (H) The department shall adjust the amounts paid under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to reflect any enrollment of students in community schools for less than the equivalent of a full school year. The department shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code rules governing the payments to community schools under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code including initial payments in a school year and adjustments and reductions made in subsequent periodic payments to community schools as provided under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code. For purposes of this division: (1) A student shall be considered enrolled in the community school for any portion of the school year the student is participating at a college under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code. (2) A student shall be considered to be enrolled in a community school for the period of time beginning on the later of the date on which the school both has received documentation of the student's enrollment from a parent and the student has commenced participation in learning opportunities as defined in the contract with the sponsor, or thirty days prior to the date on which the student is entered into the education management information system established under section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code. For purposes of applying this division and divisions (H)(3) and (4) of this section to a community school student, "learning opportunities" shall be defined in the contract, which shall describe both classroom-based and non-classroom-based learning opportunities and shall be in compliance with criteria and documentation requirements for student participation which shall be established by the department. Any student's instruction time in non-classroom-based learning opportunities shall be certified by an employee of the community school. A student's enrollment shall be considered to cease on the date on which any of the following occur: (a) The community school receives documentation from a parent terminating enrollment of the student. (b) The community school is provided documentation of a student's enrollment in another public or private school. (c) The community school ceases to offer learning opportunities to the student pursuant to the terms of the contract with the sponsor or the operation of any provision of this chapter. Except as otherwise specified in this paragraph, beginning in the 2011-2012 school year, any student who completed the prior school year in an internet- or computer-based community school shall be considered to be enrolled in the same school in the subsequent school year until the student's enrollment has ceased as specified in division (H)(2) of this section. The department shall continue paying amounts for the student under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code without interruption at the start of the subsequent school year. However, if the student without a legitimate excuse fails to participate in the first seventy-two consecutive hours of learning opportunities offered to the student in that subsequent school year, the student shall be considered not to have re-enrolled in the school for that school year and the department shall recalculate the payments to the school for that school year to account for the fact that the student is not enrolled. (3) The department shall determine each community school student's percentage of full-time equivalency based on the percentage of learning opportunities offered by the community school to that student, reported either as number of hours or number of days, is of the total learning opportunities offered by the community school to a student who attends for the school's entire school year. However, no internet- or computer-based community school shall be credited for any time a student spends participating in learning opportunities beyond ten hours within any period of twenty-four consecutive hours. Whether it reports hours or days of learning opportunities, each community school shall offer not less than nine hundred twenty hours of learning opportunities during the school year. (4) With respect to the calculation of full-time equivalency under division (H)(3) of this section, the department shall waive the number of hours or days of learning opportunities not offered to a student because the community school was closed during the school year due to disease epidemic, hazardous weather conditions, law enforcement emergencies, inoperability of school buses or other equipment necessary to the school's operation, damage to a school building, or other temporary circumstances due to utility failure rendering the school building unfit for school use, so long as the school was actually open for instruction with students in attendance during that school year for not less than the minimum number of hours required by this chapter. The department shall treat the school as if it were open for instruction with students in attendance during the hours or days waived under this division. (I) The department of education and workforce shall reduce the amounts paid under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to reflect payments made to colleges under section 3365.07 of the Revised Code. (J)(1) No student shall be considered enrolled in any internet- or computer-based community school or, if applicable to the student, in any community school that is required to provide the student with a computer pursuant to division (C) of section 3314.22 of the Revised Code, unless both of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) The student possesses or has been provided with all required hardware and software materials and all such materials are operational so that the student is capable of fully participating in the learning opportunities specified in the contract between the school and the school's sponsor as required by division (A)(23) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code; (b) The school is in compliance with division (A) of section 3314.22 of the Revised Code, relative to such student. (2) In accordance with policies adopted by the department of education and workforce, the department shall reduce the amounts otherwise payable under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to any community school that includes in its program the provision of computer hardware and software materials to any student, if such hardware and software materials have not been delivered, installed, and activated for each such student in a timely manner or other educational materials or services have not been provided according to the contract between the individual community school and its sponsor. (K)(1) If the department determines that a review of a community school's enrollment is necessary, such review shall be completed and written notice of the findings shall be provided to the governing authority of the community school and its sponsor within ninety days of the end of the community school's fiscal year, unless extended for a period not to exceed thirty additional days for one of the following reasons: (a) The department and the community school mutually agree to the extension. (b) Delays in data submission caused by either a community school or its sponsor. (2) If the review results in a finding that additional funding is owed to the school, such payment shall be made within thirty days of the written notice. If the review results in a finding that the community school owes moneys to the state, the following procedure shall apply: (a) Within ten business days of the receipt of the notice of findings, the community school may appeal the department's determination to the director. (b) The director shall conduct an informal hearing on the matter within thirty days of receipt of such an appeal and shall issue a decision within fifteen days of the conclusion of the hearing. (c) Any decision made by the director under this division is final. (3) If it is decided that the community school owes moneys to the state, the department shall deduct such amount from the school's future payments in accordance with guidelines issued by the director. (L) The department shall not pay to a community school under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code any amount for any of the following: (1) Any student who has graduated from the twelfth grade of a public or nonpublic high school; (2) Any student who is not a resident of the state; (3) Any student who was enrolled in the community school during the previous school year when assessments were administered under section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code but did not take one or more of the assessments required by that section and was not excused pursuant to division (C)(1) or (3) of that section, unless the director grants the student a waiver from the requirement to take the assessment and a parent is not paying tuition for the student pursuant to section 3314.26 of the Revised Code. The director may grant a waiver only for good cause in accordance with rules adopted by the department. (4) Any student who has attained the age of twenty-two years, except for veterans of the armed services whose attendance was interrupted before completing the recognized twelve-year course of the public schools by reason of induction or enlistment in the armed forces and who apply for enrollment in a community school not later than four years after termination of war or their honorable discharge. If, however, any such veteran elects to enroll in special courses organized for veterans for whom tuition is paid under federal law, or otherwise, the department shall not pay to a community school under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code any amount for that veteran. Sec. 3317.011. This section shall apply only for fiscal years 2026 and 2027. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Average administrative assistant salary" means the average salary of administrative assistants employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $20,000 but less than $65,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department of education and workforce. (2) "Average bookkeeping and accounting employee salary" means the average salary of bookkeeping employees and accounting employees employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $20,000 but less than $80,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (3) "Average clerical staff salary" means the average salary of clerical staff employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $15,000 but less than $50,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (4) "Average counselor salary" means the average salary of counselors employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $30,000 but less than $95,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (5) "Average education management information system support employee salary" means the average salary of accounting employees employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $30,000 but less than $90,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (6) "Average librarian and media staff salary" means the average salary of librarians and media staff employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $30,000 but less than $95,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (7) "Average other district administrator salary" means the average salary of all assistant superintendents and directors employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $50,000 but less than $135,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (8) "Average principal salary" means the average salary of all principals employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $50,000 but less than $120,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (9) "Average superintendent salary" means the average salary of all superintendents employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $60,000 but less than $180,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (10) "Average teacher cost" for a fiscal year is equal to the sum of the following: (a) The average salary of teachers employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $30,000 but less than $95,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department; (b) An amount for teacher benefits equal to 0.16 times the average salary calculated under division (A)(10)(a) of this section; (c) An amount for district-paid insurance costs equal to the following product: The statewide weighted average employer-paid monthly premium based on data reported by city, local, and exempted village school districts to the state employment relations board for the health insurance survey conducted in accordance with divisions (K)(5) and (6) of section 4117.02 of the Revised Code using fiscal year 2022 data X 12 (11) "Eligible school district" means a city, local, or exempted village school district that satisfies one of the following: (a) The district is a member of an organization that regulates interscholastic athletics. (b) The district has teams in at least three different sports that participate in an interscholastic league. (B) When calculating a district's aggregate base cost under this section, the department shall use data from fiscal year 2022 for all of the following: (1) The average salaries determined under divisions (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and (10)(a) of this section; (2) The amount for teacher benefits determined under division (A)(10)(b) of this section; (3) The district-paid insurance costs determined under division (A)(10)(c) of this section; (4) The spending determined under divisions (E)(4)(a), (E)(5)(a), (E)(6)(a), and (H)(1) of this section and the corresponding student counts determined under divisions (E)(4)(b), (E)(5)(b), (E)(6)(b), and (H)(2) of this section; (5) The information determined under division (G)(3) of this section. (C) A city, local, or exempted village school district's aggregate base cost for a fiscal year shall be equal to the following sum: (The district's teacher base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (D) of this section) + (the district's student support base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (E) of this section) + (the district's leadership and accountability base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (F) of this section) + (the district's building leadership and operations base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (G) of this section) + (the athletic co-curricular activities base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (H) of this section, if the district is an eligible school district) (D) The department shall compute a district's teacher base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the district's classroom teacher cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a)(a)(i) Determine the full-time equivalency of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in a preschool program operated by the district and divide that number by 10; (ii) Determine the full-time equivalency of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in kindergarten and divide that number by 20; . (b) Determine the full-time equivalency of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades one through three and divide that number by 23; (c) Determine the full-time equivalency of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades four through eight but are not enrolled in a career-technical education program or class described under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and divide that number by 25; (d) Determine the full-time equivalency of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades nine through twelve but are not enrolled in a career-technical education program or class described under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and divide that number by 27; (e) Determine the full-time equivalency of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in a career-technical education program or class, as certified under divisions (B)(11), (12), (13), (14), and (15) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, and divide that number by 18; (f) Compute the sum of the quotients obtained under divisions (D)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this section; (g) Compute the classroom teacher cost by multiplying the average teacher cost for that fiscal year by the sum computed under division (D)(1)(f) of this section. (2) Calculate the district's special teacher cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 150; (b) If the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section is greater than 6, the special teacher cost shall be equal to that quotient multiplied by the average teacher cost for that fiscal year. (c) If the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section is less than or equal to 6, the special teacher cost shall be equal to 6 multiplied by the average teacher cost for that fiscal year. (3) Calculate the district's substitute teacher cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: (a) Compute the substitute teacher daily rate with benefits by multiplying the substitute teacher daily rate of $90 by 1.16; (b) Compute the substitute teacher cost in accordance with the following formula: [The sum computed under division (D)(1)(f) of this section + (the greater of the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section and 6)] X the amount computed under division (D)(3)(a) of this section X 5 (4) Calculate the district's professional development cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: [The sum computed under division (D)(1)(f) of this section + (the greater of the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section and 6)] X [(the sum of divisions (A)(10)(a) and (b) of this section for that fiscal year)/180] X 4 (5) Calculate the district's teacher base cost for that fiscal year, which equals the sum of divisions (D)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section. (E) The department shall compute a district's student support base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the district's guidance counselor cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the number of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades nine through twelve and divide that number by 360; (b) Compute the counselor cost in accordance with the following formula: (The greater of the quotient obtained under division (E)(1)(a) of this section and 1) X [(the average counselor salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year] (2) Calculate the district's librarian and media staff cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 1,000; (b) Compute the librarian and media staff cost in accordance with the following formula: The quotient obtained under division (E)(2)(a) of this section X [(the average librarian and media staff salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year] (3) Calculate the district's staffing cost for student wellness and success for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 250; (b) Compute the staffing cost for student wellness and success in accordance with the following formula: (The greater of the quotient obtained under division (E)(3)(a) of this section and 5) X [(the average counselor salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year] (4) Calculate the district's academic co-curricular activities cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the total amount of spending for academic co-curricular activities reported by city, local, and exempted village school districts to the department using fiscal year 2022 data; (b) Determine the sum of the enrolled ADM of every school district in the state using fiscal year 2022 data as specified under division (E)(4)(a) of this section; (c) Compute the academic co-curricular activities cost in accordance with the following formula: (The amount determined under division (E)(4)(a) of this section / the sum determined under division (E)(4)(b) of this section) X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for the fiscal year for which the academic co-curricular activities cost is computed (5) Calculate the district's building safety and security cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the total amount of spending for building safety and security reported by city, local, and exempted village school districts to the department using fiscal year 2022 data; (b) Determine the sum of the enrolled ADM of every school district in the state that reported the data specified under division (E)(5)(a) of this section using fiscal year 2022 data; (c) Compute the building safety and security cost in accordance with the following formula: (The amount determined under division (E)(5)(a) of this section / the sum determined under division (E)(5)(a) of this section) X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for the fiscal year for which the building safety and security cost is computed (6) Calculate the district's supplies and academic content cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the total amount of spending for supplies and academic content, excluding supplies for transportation and maintenance, reported by city, local, and exempted village school districts to the department using fiscal year 2022 data; (b) Determine the sum of the enrolled ADM of every school district in the state using fiscal year 2022 data as specified under division (E)(6)(a) of this section; (c) Compute the supplies and academic content cost in accordance with the following formula: (The amount determined under division (E)(6)(a) of this section / the sum determined under division (E)(6)(b) of this section) X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for the fiscal year for which the supplies and academic content cost is computed (7) Calculate the district's technology cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: $37.50 X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year (8) Calculate the district's student support base cost for that fiscal year, which equals the sum of divisions (E)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), and (7) of this section. (F) The department shall compute a district's leadership and accountability base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the district's superintendent cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is greater than 4,000, then the district's superintendent cost shall be equal to [($160,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year]. (b) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is less than or equal to 4,000 but greater than or equal to 500, the district's superintendent cost shall be equal to the sum of the following: (i) (The district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year - 500) X {[($160,000 X 1.16) - ($80,000 X 1.16)]/3500}; (ii) ($80,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year. (c) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM is less than 500, then the district's superintendent cost shall be equal to [($80,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year]. (2) Calculate the district's treasurer cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is greater than 4,000, then the district's treasurer cost shall be equal to [($130,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year]. (b) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is less than or equal to 4,000 but greater than or equal to 500, the district's treasurer cost shall be equal to the sum of the following: (i) (The district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year - 500) X {[($130,000 X 1.16) - ($60,000 X 1.16)]/3500}; (ii) ($60,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year. (c) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM is less than 500, then the district's treasurer cost shall be equal to [($60,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year]. (3) Calculate the district's other district administrator cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the average other district administrator salary for that fiscal year by the average superintendent salary for that fiscal year; (b) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 750; (c) Compute the other district administrator cost in accordance with the following formula: {[(The district's superintendent cost for that fiscal year calculated under division (F)(1) of this section - the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year) X the quotient obtained under division (F)(3)(a) of this section] + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section} X (the greater of the quotient obtained under division (F)(3)(b) of this section and 2) (4) Calculate the district's fiscal support cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 850; (b) Determine the lesser of the following: (i) The maximum of the quotient obtained under division (F)(4)(a) of this section and 2; (ii) 35. (c) Compute the fiscal support cost in accordance with the following formula: The number obtained under division (F)(4)(b) of this section X [(the average bookkeeping and accounting employee salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year] (5) Calculate the district's education management information system support cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 5,000; (b) Compute the education management information system support cost in accordance with the following formula: (The greater of the quotient obtained under division (F)(5)(a) of this section and 1) X [(the average education management information system support employee salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year] (6) Calculate the district's leadership support cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the greater of the quotient obtained under division (F)(3)(b) of this section and 2, and add 1 to that number; (b) Divide the number obtained under division (F)(6)(a) of this section by 3; (c) Compute the leadership support cost in accordance with the following formula: (The greater of the quotient obtained under division (F)(6)(b) of this section and 1) X [(the average administrative assistant salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year] (7) Calculate the district's information technology center support cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: $31 X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year (8) Calculate the district's district leadership and accountability base cost for that fiscal year, which equals the sum of divisions (F)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), and (7) of this section. (G) The department shall compute a district's building leadership and operations base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the district's building leadership cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the average principal salary for that fiscal year by the average superintendent salary for that fiscal year; (b) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 450; (c) Compute the building leadership cost in accordance with the following formula: {[(The district's superintendent cost for that fiscal year calculated under division (F)(1) of this section - the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year) X the quotient obtained under division (G)(1)(a) of this section] + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year} X the quotient obtained under division (G)(1)(b) of this section (2) Calculate the district's building leadership support cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 400; (b) Determine the number of school buildings in the district for the preceding fiscal year; (c) Compute the building leadership support cost in accordance with the following formula: (i) If the quotient obtained under division (G)(2)(a) of this section is less than the number obtained under division (G)(2)(b) of this section, then the district's building leadership support cost shall be equal to {the number obtained under division (G)(2)(b) of this section for that fiscal year X [(the average clerical staff salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year]}. (ii) If the quotient obtained under division (G)(2)(a) of this section is greater than or equal to the number obtained under division (G)(2)(b) of this section, then the district's building leadership support cost shall be equal to {[the lesser of (the number obtained under division (G)(2)(b) of this section X 3) and the quotient obtained under division (G)(2)(a) of this section] X [(the average clerical staff salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year]}. (3) Calculate the district's building operations cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine both of the following: (i) The average building square feet per pupil for all city, local, and exempted village school district buildings in the state; (ii) The average cost per square foot for all city, local, and exempted village school district buildings in the state. (b) Compute the building operations cost in accordance with the following formula: The district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year X [(the number determined under division (G)(3)(a)(i) of this section X the number determined under division (G)(3)(a)(ii) of this section) - (the amount determined under division (E)(5)(a) of this section for that fiscal year/ the sum determined under division (E)(5)(b) of this section for that fiscal year)] (4) Calculate the district's building leadership and operations base cost for that fiscal year, which equals the sum of divisions (G)(1), (2), and (3) of this section. (H) If a district is an eligible school district, the department shall compute the district's athletic co-curricular activities base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Determine the total amount of spending for athletic co-curricular activities reported by city, local, and exempted village school districts to the department for that fiscal year; (2) Determine the sum of the enrolled ADM of every school district in the state for that fiscal year; (3) Compute the district's athletic co-curricular activities base cost in accordance with the following formula: (The amount determined under division (H)(1) of this section / the sum determined under division (H)(2) of this section) X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for the fiscal year for which the funds for athletic co-curricular activities are computed Sec. 3317.0110. This section shall apply only for fiscal years 2026 and 2027. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Average teacher cost" for a fiscal year has the same meaning as in section 3317.011 of the Revised Code. (2) "Eligible community or STEM school" means a community or STEM school that satisfies one of the following: (a) The school is a member of an organization that regulates interscholastic athletics. (b) The school has teams in at least three different sports that participate in an interscholastic league. (B) When calculating a community or STEM school's aggregate base cost under this section, the department of education and workforce shall use data from fiscal year 2022 for the average teacher cost. (C) A community or STEM school's aggregate base cost for a fiscal year shall be equal to the following sum: (The school's teacher base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (D) of this section) + (the school's student support base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (E) of this section) + (the school's leadership and accountability base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (F) of this section) + (the school's building leadership and operations base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (G) of this section) + (the school's athletic co-curricular activities base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (H) of this section, if the school is an eligible community or STEM school) (D) The department shall compute a community or STEM school's teacher base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the school's classroom teacher cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a)(a)(i) Determine the full-time equivalency of students enrolled in the school's preschool program, if it has one, for the fiscal year and divide that number by 10; (ii) Determine the full-time equivalency of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year that are enrolled in kindergarten and divide that number by 20; . (b) Determine the full-time equivalency of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades one through three and divide that number by 23; (c) Determine the full-time equivalency of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades four through eight but are not enrolled in a career-technical education program or class described under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and divide that number by 25; (d) Determine the full-time equivalency of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades nine through twelve but are not enrolled in a career-technical education program or class described under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and divide that number by 27; (e) Determine the full-time equivalency of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year that are enrolled in a career-technical education program or class, as reported under division (B)(4) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code, and divide that number by 18; (f) Compute the sum of the quotients obtained under divisions (D)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this section; (g) Compute the classroom teacher cost by multiplying the average teacher cost for that fiscal year by the sum computed under division (D)(1)(f) of this section. (2) Calculate the school's special teacher cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year by 150; (b) Compute the special teacher cost by multiplying the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section by the average teacher cost for that fiscal year. (3) Calculate the school's substitute teacher cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: (a) Compute the substitute teacher daily rate with benefits by multiplying the substitute teacher daily rate of $90 by 1.16; (b) Compute the substitute teacher cost in accordance with the following formula: (The sum computed under division (D)(1)(f) of this section + the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section) X the amount computed under division (D)(3)(a) of this section X 5 (4) Calculate the school's professional development cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: (The sum computed under division (D)(1)(f) of this section + the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section) X [(the sum of divisions (A)(10)(a) and (b) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year)/180] X 4 (5) Calculate the school's teacher base cost for that fiscal year, which equals the sum of divisions (D)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section. (E) The department shall compute a community or STEM school's student support base cost for a fiscal year as follows: The number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year X [(the sum of the student support base cost calculated for all city, local, and exempted village school districts in the state for that fiscal year under division (E) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code) / the sum of the base cost enrolled ADMs of all of the city, local, and exempted village school districts in the state for that fiscal year] (F) The department shall compute a community or STEM school's leadership and accountability base cost for a fiscal year as follows: The number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year X (the sum of the leadership and accountability base cost calculated for all city, local, and exempted village school districts in the state for that fiscal year under division (F) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code / the sum of the base cost enrolled ADMs of all of the city, local, and exempted village school districts in the state for that fiscal year) (G) The department shall compute a community or STEM school's building leadership and operations base cost for a fiscal year as follows: The number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year X (the sum of the building leadership and accountability base cost calculated for all city, local, and exempted village school districts in the state for that fiscal year under division (G) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code / the sum of the base cost enrolled ADMs of all of the city, local, and exempted village school districts in the state for that fiscal year) (H) If a community or STEM school is an eligible community or STEM school, the department shall compute the school's athletic co-curricular activities base cost for a fiscal year as follows: The number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year X (the amount determined under division (H)(1) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code / the sum determined under division (H)(2) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code) Sec. 3317.02. As used in this chapter: (A) "Alternative school" has the same meaning as in section 3313.974 of the Revised Code. (B) "Autism scholarship unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students for whom autism scholarships are awarded under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code. (C) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, a district's "base cost enrolled ADM" for a fiscal year means the greater of the following: (1) The district's enrolled ADM for the previous fiscal year; (2) The average of the district's enrolled ADM for the previous three fiscal years. (D)(1) "Base cost per pupil" means the following for a city, local, or exempted village school district: (a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the aggregate base cost calculated for that district for that fiscal year under section 3317.011 of the Revised Code divided by the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year; (b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (2) "Base cost per pupil" means the following for a joint vocational school district: (a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the aggregate base cost calculated for that district for that fiscal year under section 3317.012 of the Revised Code divided by the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year; (b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (E)(1) "Category one career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(1) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(11) or (D)(2)(h) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (2) "Category two career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(2) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(12) or (D)(2)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (3) "Category three career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(3) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(13) or (D)(2)(j) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (4) "Category four career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(4) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(14) or (D)(2)(k) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (5) "Category five career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(5) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(15) or (D)(2)(l) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) "Category one English learner ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of English learners described in division (A) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(16) or (D)(2)(m) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(6) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (E) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (2) "Category two English learner ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of English learners described in division (B) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(17) or (D)(2)(n) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(6) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (E) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (3) "Category three English learner ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of English learners described in division (C) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(18) or (D)(2)(o) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(6) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (E) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) "Category one special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of children with disabilities receiving special education services for the disability specified in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(5) or (D)(2)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (2) "Category two special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of children with disabilities receiving special education services for those disabilities specified in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(6) or (D)(2)(c) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (3) "Category three special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of students receiving special education services for those disabilities specified in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(7) or (D)(2)(d) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (4) "Category four special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of students receiving special education services for those disabilities specified in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(8) or (D)(2)(e) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (5) "Category five special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of students receiving special education services for the disabilities specified in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(9) or (D)(2)(f) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (6) "Category six special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of students receiving special education services for the disabilities specified in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district certified under division (B)(10) or (D)(2)(g) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (H) "Community and STEM school unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students enrolled in community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code and science, technology, engineering, and mathematics schools established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (I)(1) "Economically disadvantaged index for a school district" means the following: (a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the square of the quotient of that district's percentage of students in its enrolled ADM who are identified as economically disadvantaged as defined by the department of education and workforce, divided by the percentage of students in the statewide ADM identified as economically disadvantaged. For purposes of this calculation: (i) For a city, local, or exempted village school district, the "statewide ADM" equals the sum of the following: (I) The enrolled ADM for all city, local, and exempted village school districts combined; (II) The statewide enrollment of students in community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (III) The statewide enrollment of students in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics schools established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (ii) For a joint vocational school district, the "statewide ADM" equals the sum of the enrolled ADM for all joint vocational school districts combined. (b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an index calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (2) "Economically disadvantaged index for a community or STEM school" means the following: (a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the square of the quotient of the percentage of students enrolled in the school who are identified as economically disadvantaged as defined by the department, divided by the percentage of students in the statewide ADM identified as economically disadvantaged. For purposes of this calculation, the "statewide ADM" equals the "statewide ADM" for city, local, and exempted village school districts described in division (I)(1)(a)(i) of this section. (b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an index calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (J) "Educational choice scholarship unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students for whom educational choice scholarships are awarded under sections 3310.03 and 3310.032 of the Revised Code. (K) "Enrolled ADM" means the following: (1) For a city, local, or exempted village school district, the enrollment reported under division (A) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, as verified by the department and adjusted if so ordered under division (K) of that section, and as further adjusted by the department, as follows: (a) Add the students described in division (A)(1)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (b) Subtract the students counted under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (c) Count only twenty per cent of the number of joint vocational school district students counted under division (A)(3) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (d) Add twenty per cent of the number of students who are entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code and are enrolled in another school district under a career-technical education compact; (e) Add twenty per cent of the number of students described in division (A)(1)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code who enroll in a joint vocational school district or under a career-technical education compact. (2) For a joint vocational school district, the final number verified by the department, based on the enrollment reported and certified under division (D) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, as adjusted, if so ordered, under division (K) of that section, and as further adjusted by the department by adding the students described in division (D)(1)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (3) For the community and STEM school unit, the sum of the number of students reported as enrolled in community schools under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and the number of students reported as enrolled in STEM schools under division (A) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code; (4) For the educational choice scholarship unit, the number of students for whom educational choice scholarships are awarded under sections 3310.03 and 3310.032 of the Revised Code as reported under division (A)(2)(g) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (5) For the pilot project scholarship unit, the number of students for whom pilot project scholarships are awarded under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code as reported under division (A)(2)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (6) For the autism scholarship unit, the number of students for whom autism scholarships are awarded under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code as reported under division (A)(2)(h) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (7) For the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship unit, the number of students for whom Jon Peterson special needs scholarships are awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code as reported under division (A)(2)(h) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (L)(1) "Formula ADM" means, for a city, local, or exempted village school district, the enrollment reported under division (A) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, as verified by the department and adjusted if so ordered under division (K) of that section, and as further adjusted by the department, as follows: (a) Count only twenty per cent of the number of joint vocational school district students counted under division (A)(3) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (b) Add twenty per cent of the number of students who are entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code and are enrolled in another school district under a career-technical education compact. (2) "Formula ADM" means, for a joint vocational school district, the final number verified by the department, based on the enrollment reported and certified under division (D) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, as adjusted, if so ordered, under division (K) of that section. (M) "FTE basis" means a count of students based on full-time equivalency, in accordance with rules adopted by the department pursuant to section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. In adopting its rules under this division, the department shall provide for counting any student in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM or in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM in the same proportion the student is counted in enrolled ADM and formula ADM. (N) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "funding base" means, for a city, local, or exempted village school district, the sum of the following as calculated by the department: (1) The district's "general funding base," which equals the amount calculated as follows: (a) Compute the sum of the following: (i) The amount calculated for the district for fiscal year 2020 under division (A)(1) of Section 265.220 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly after any adjustments required under Section 265.227 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly and prior to any funding reductions authorized by Executive Order 2020-19D, "Implementing Additional Spending Controls to Balance the State Budget" issued on May 7, 2020; (ii) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the district's payments for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (C)(1), (3), and (4) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021. (b) Subtract from the amount calculated in division (N)(1)(a) of this section the sum of the following: (i) The following difference: (The amount paid to the district under division (A)(5) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2019) - (the amounts deducted from the district and paid to a community school under division (C)(1)(e) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code or a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school under division (E) of section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2020 in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly) (ii) The payments deducted from the district and paid to a community school for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (C)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (iii) The payments deducted from the district and paid to a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (A), (B), (C), (D), (E), (F), and (G) of section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (iv) The payments deducted from the district under division (C) of section 3310.08 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, division (C)(2) of section 3310.41 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, and former section 3310.55 of the Revised Code for fiscal year 2020 and, in the case of a pilot project school district as defined in section 3313.975 of the Revised Code, the funds deducted from the district under Section 265.210 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly to operate the pilot project scholarship program for fiscal year 2020 under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code; (v) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the payments subtracted from the district for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (B)(1) and (3) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021. (2) The district's "disadvantaged pupil impact aid funding base," which equals the following difference: (The amount paid to the district under division (A)(5) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2019) - (the amounts deducted from the district and paid to a community school under division (C)(1)(e) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code or a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school under division (E) of section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2020 in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly) (O) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "funding base" means, for a joint vocational school district, the sum of the following as calculated by the department: (1) The district's "general funding base," which equals the amount calculated as follows: (a) Compute the sum of the following: (i) The district's payments for fiscal year 2020 under Section 265.225 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly after any adjustments required under Section 265.227 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (ii) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the district's payments for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (D)(1) and (2) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021. (b) Subtract from the amount paid to the district under division (A)(3) of section 3317.16 of the Revised Code, as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2019. (2) The district's "disadvantaged pupil impact aid funding base," which equals the amount paid to the district under division (A)(3) of section 3317.16 of the Revised Code, as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2019. (P) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "funding base" for a community school means the following: (1) For a community school that was in operation for the entirety of fiscal year 2020, the amount paid to the school for that fiscal year under division (C)(1) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly and the amount, if any, paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3314.085 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (2) For a community school that was in operation for part of fiscal year 2020, the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under division (C)(1) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department, and the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3314.085 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly, if any, if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department; (3) For a community school that was not in operation for fiscal year 2020, the amount that would have been paid to the school if it was in operation for that school year under division (C)(1) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department, and the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3314.085 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly, if any, if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department. (Q) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "funding base" for a STEM school means the following: (1) For a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school that was in operation for the entirety of fiscal year 2020, the amount paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly and the amount, if any, paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.41 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (2) For a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school that was in operation for part of fiscal year 2020, the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department, and the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.41 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly, if any, if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department; (3) For a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school that was not in operation for fiscal year 2020, the amount that would have been paid to the school if it was in operation for that school year under section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department, and the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.41 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly, if any, if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department. (R) "Funding unit" means any of the following: (1) A city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district; (2) The community and STEM school unit; (3) The educational choice scholarship unit; (4) The pilot project scholarship unit; (5) The autism scholarship unit; (6) The Jon Peterson special needs scholarship unit. (S) "Jon Peterson special needs scholarship unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students for whom Jon Peterson scholarships are awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. (T) "Internet- or computer-based community school" has the same meaning as in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. (U) "LRE student with a disability" means a child with a disability who has an individualized education program providing for the student to spend more than half of each school day in a regular school setting with nondisabled students. For purposes of this division, "individualized education program" and "child with a disability" have the same meanings as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, and "LRE" is an abbreviation for "least restrictive environment." (V) "Medically fragile child" means a child to whom all of the following apply: (1) The child requires the services of a doctor of medicine or osteopathic medicine at least once a week due to the instability of the child's medical condition. (2) The child requires the services of a registered nurse on a daily basis. (3) The child is at risk of institutionalization in a hospital, skilled nursing facility, or intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities. (W)(1) A child may be identified as having an "other health impairment-major" if the child's condition meets the definition of "other health impaired" established in rules previously adopted by the department and if either of the following apply: (a) The child is identified as having a medical condition that is among those listed by the department as conditions where a substantial majority of cases fall within the definition of "medically fragile child." (b) The child is determined by the department to be a medically fragile child. A school district superintendent may petition the department for a determination that a child is a medically fragile child. (2) A child may be identified as having an "other health impairment-minor" if the child's condition meets the definition of "other health impaired" established in rules previously adopted by the department but the child's condition does not meet either of the conditions specified in division (W)(1)(a) or (b) of this section. (X)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district's, community school's, or STEM school's "general phase-in percentage" is equal to the percentage for that fiscal year that is determined by the general assembly. (2) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district's "phase-in percentage for disadvantaged pupil impact aid" is equal to the percentage for that fiscal year that is determined by the general assembly. (Y) "Pilot project scholarship unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students for whom pilot project scholarships are awarded under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code. (Z)(Z)(1) "Preschool child with a disability" means a child with a disability, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, who is at least age three but is not of compulsory school age, as defined in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code, and who is not currently enrolled in kindergarten. (2) "Preschool program" means a preschool program that is licensed under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code. (AA) "Related services" includes: (1) Child study, special education supervisors and coordinators, speech and hearing services, adaptive physical development services, occupational or physical therapy, teacher assistants for children with disabilities whose disabilities are described in division (B) of section 3317.013 or division (G)(3) of this section, behavioral intervention, interpreter services, work study, nursing services, and specialized integrative services as those terms are defined by the department; (2) Speech and language services provided to any student with a disability, including any student whose primary or only disability is a speech and language disability; (3) Any related service not specifically covered by other state funds but specified in federal law, including but not limited to, audiology and school psychological services; (4) Any service included in units funded under former division (O)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code; (5) Any other related service needed by children with disabilities in accordance with their individualized education programs. (BB) "School district," unless otherwise specified, means city, local, and exempted village school districts. (CC) "Separately educated student with a disability" has the same meaning as in section 3313.974 of the Revised Code. (DD) "State education aid" has the same meaning as in section 5751.20 of the Revised Code. (EE)(1) "State share percentage" means the following for a city, local, or exempted village school district: (a) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the state share percentage calculated under section 3317.017 of the Revised Code; (b) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, a percentage calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (2) "State share percentage" means, for a joint vocational school district, the district's state share percentage calculated under section 3317.165 of the Revised Code. (FF) "Statewide average base cost per pupil" means the following: (1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the statewide average base cost per pupil calculated under division (A) of section 3317.018 of the Revised Code; (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (GG) "Statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil" means the following: (1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil calculated under division (B) of section 3317.018 of the Revised Code; (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (HH) "STEM school" means a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (II) "Taxes charged and payable" means the taxes charged and payable against real and public utility property after making the reduction required by section 319.301 of the Revised Code, plus the taxes levied against tangible personal property. (JJ) For purposes of sections 3317.017 and 3317.165 of the Revised Code, "three-year average valuation" for a fiscal year means the average of total taxable value for the three most recent tax years for which data is available, as certified under section 3317.021 of the Revised Code. (KK) "Total ADM" means, for a city, local, or exempted village school district, the enrollment reported under division (A) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code minus the enrollment reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (g), (h), and (i) of that section, as verified by the department and adjusted if so ordered under division (K) of that section. (LL) "Total special education ADM" means the sum of categories one through six special education ADM. (MM) "Total taxable value" means the sum of the amounts certified for a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district under divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 3317.021 of the Revised Code. (NN) "Tuition discount" means any deduction from the base tuition amount per student charged by a chartered nonpublic school, to which the student's family is entitled due to one or more of the following conditions: (1) The student's family has multiple children enrolled in the same school. (2) The student's family is a member of or affiliated with a religious or secular organization that provides oversight of the school or from which the school has agreed to enroll students. (3) The student's parent is an employee of the school. (4) Some other qualification not based on the income of the student's family or the student's athletic or academic ability and for which all students in the school may qualify. Sec. 3317.0213. (A) The department of education and workforce shall compute and pay in accordance with this section additional state aid for preschool children with disabilities to each city, local, and exempted village school district and to each institution, as defined in section 3323.091 of the Revised Code. Funding shall be provided for children who are not enrolled in kindergarten and who are under age six on the thirtieth day of September of the academic year, or on the first day of August of the academic year if the school district in which the child is enrolled has adopted a resolution under division (A)(3) of section 3321.01 of the Revised Code, but not less than age three on the first day of December of the academic year. For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the additional state aid shall be calculated under the following formula: ($4,000 X the number of students who are preschool children with disabilities) + the sum of the following: (1) The district's or institution's category one special education students who are preschool children with disabilities X the multiple specified in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage X 0.50; (2) The district's or institution's category two special education students who are preschool children with disabilities X the multiple specified in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage X 0.50; (3) The district's or institution's category three special education students who are preschool children with disabilities X the multiple specified in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage X 0.50; (4) The district's or institution's category four special education students who are preschool children with disabilities X the multiple specified in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage X 0.50; (5) The district's or institution's category five special education students who are preschool children with disabilities X the multiple specified in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage X 0.50; (6) The district's or institution's category six special education students who are preschool children with disabilities X the multiple specified in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage X 0.50. For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the additional state aid shall be calculated for each category of special education students who are preschool children with disabilities using a formula specified by the general assembly. The special education disability categories for preschool children used in this section are the same categories prescribed in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code. As used in division (A) of this section, the state share percentage of a student enrolled in an institution is the state share percentage of the school district in which the student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (B) If an educational service center is providing services to students who are preschool children with disabilities under agreement with the city, local, or exempted village school district in which the students are entitled to attend school, that district may authorize the department to transfer funds computed under this section to the service center providing those services. (C) If a county DD board is providing services to students who are preschool children with disabilities under agreement with the city, local, or exempted village school district in which the students are entitled to attend school, the department shall deduct from the district's payment computed under division (A) of this section the total amount of those funds that are attributable to the students served by the county DD board and pay that amount to that board. Sec. 3317.03. (A) The superintendent of each city, local, and exempted village school district shall report to the department of education and workforce as of the last day of October, March, and June of each year the enrollment of students receiving services from schools under the superintendent's supervision, and the numbers of other students entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code the superintendent is required to report under this section, so that the department can calculate the district's enrolled ADM, formula ADM, total ADM, category one through five career-technical education ADM, category one through three English learner ADM, category one through six special education ADM, transportation ADM, and, for purposes of provisions of law outside of Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code, average daily membership. (1) The enrollment reported by the superintendent during the reporting period shall consist of the sum of the number of students in grades kindergarten through twelve receiving any educational services from the district and the number of students enrolled in the district's preschool program who reside in the district, except that the following categories of students shall not be included in the determination: (a) Students enrolled in adult education classes; (b) Adjacent or other district students enrolled in the district under an open enrollment policy pursuant to section 3313.98 of the Revised Code; (c) Students receiving services in the district pursuant to a compact, cooperative education agreement, or a contract, but who are entitled to attend school in another district pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code; (d) Students for whom tuition is payable pursuant to sections 3317.081 and 3323.141 of the Revised Code; (e) Students receiving services in the district through a scholarship awarded under either section 3310.41 or sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. When reporting students under division (A)(1) of this section, the superintendent also shall report the district where each student is entitled to attend school pursuant to sections 3313.64 and 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (2) The department shall compile a list of all students reported to be enrolled in a district under division (A)(1) of this section and of the students entitled to attend school in the district pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code on an FTE basis but receiving educational services in grades kindergarten through twelve from one or more of the following entities: (a) A community school pursuant to Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, including any participation in a college pursuant to Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code while enrolled in such community school; (b) An alternative school pursuant to sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code; (c) A college pursuant to Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code, except when the student is enrolled in the college while also enrolled in a community school pursuant to Chapter 3314., a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (d) An adjacent or other school district under an open enrollment policy adopted pursuant to section 3313.98 of the Revised Code; (e) An educational service center or cooperative education district; (f) Another school district under a cooperative education agreement, compact, or contract; (g) A chartered nonpublic school with a scholarship paid under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, if the students qualified for the scholarship under section 3310.03 or 3310.032 of the Revised Code; (h) An alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under either section 3310.41 or sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. As used in this section, "alternative public provider" and "registered private provider" have the same meanings as in section 3310.41 or 3310.51 of the Revised Code, as applicable. (i) A science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, including any participation in a college pursuant to Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code while enrolled in the school; (j) A college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, including any participation in a college pursuant to Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code while enrolled in the school. (3) The department also shall compile a list of the students entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code who are enrolled in a joint vocational school district or under a career-technical education compact, excluding any students so entitled to attend school in the district who are enrolled in another school district through an open enrollment policy as reported under division (A)(2)(d) of this section and then enroll in a joint vocational school district or under a career-technical education compact. The department shall provide each city, local, and exempted village school district with an opportunity to review the list of students compiled under divisions (A)(2) and (3) of this section to ensure that the students reported accurately reflect the enrollment of students in the district. (B) To enable the department to obtain the data needed to complete the calculation of payments pursuant to this chapter, each superintendent shall certify from the reports provided by the department under division (A) of this section all of the following: (1) (1)(a) The total student enrollment in regular learning day classes included in the report under division (A)(1) or (2), including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section, of this section for each of the individual grades kindergarten through twelve in schools under the superintendent's supervision; (b) The total enrollment of students in the district's preschool program who reside in the district. (2) The unduplicated count of the number of preschool children with disabilities enrolled in the district for whom the district is eligible to receive funding under section 3317.0213 of the Revised Code adjusted for the portion of the year each child is so enrolled, in accordance with the disability categories prescribed in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (3) The number of children entitled to attend school in the district pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code who are: (a) Enrolled in a college under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code, except when the student is enrolled in the college while also enrolled in a community school pursuant to Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (b) Participating in a program operated by a county board of developmental disabilities or a state institution. (4) The total enrollment of pupils in joint vocational schools; (5) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section, receiving special education services for the category one disability described in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (6) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section, receiving special education services for category two disabilities described in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (7) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section, receiving special education services for category three disabilities described in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (8) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section, receiving special education services for category four disabilities described in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (9) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section, receiving special education services for the category five disabilities described in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (10) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section, receiving special education services for category six disabilities described in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under either section 3310.41 or sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (11) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section, in category one career-technical education programs or classes, described in division (A)(1) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or by another district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (12) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section, in category two career-technical education programs or services, described in division (A)(2) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or another school district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (13) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section, in category three career-technical education programs or services, described in division (A)(3) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or another school district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (14) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section, in category four career-technical education programs or services, described in division (A)(4) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or another school district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (15) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section, in category five career-technical education programs or services, described in division (A)(5) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or another school district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (16) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section who are English learners described in division (A) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section; (17) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section who are English learners described in division (B) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section; (18) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section who are English learners described in division (C) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section; (19) The average number of children transported during the reporting period by the school district on board-owned or contractor-owned and -operated buses, reported in accordance with rules adopted by the department; (20)(a) The number of children, other than preschool children with disabilities, the district placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in fiscal year 1998. Division (B)(20)(a) of this section does not apply after fiscal year 2013. (b) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for the category one disability described in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (c) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for category two disabilities described in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (d) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for category three disabilities described in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (e) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for category four disabilities described in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (f) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for the category five disabilities described in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (g) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for category six disabilities described in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code. (21) The enrollment of students who are economically disadvantaged, as defined by the department, including any student described in divisions (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section. A student shall not be categorically excluded from the number reported under division (B)(21) of this section based on anything other than family income. (22) The enrollment of students identified as gifted under division (A), (B), (C), or (D) of section 3324.03 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) The department shall adopt rules necessary for implementing divisions (A), (B), and (D) of this section. (2) A student enrolled in a community school established under Chapter 3314., a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code shall be counted in the formula ADM of the school district in which the student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code for the same proportion of the school year that the student is counted in the enrollment of the community school, the science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school, or the college-preparatory boarding school for purposes of section 3317.022 or 3328.24 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding the enrollment of students reported pursuant to division (A)(2)(a), (i), or (j) of this section, the department may adjust the formula ADM of a school district to account for students entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code who are enrolled in a community school, a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school, or a college-preparatory boarding school for only a portion of the school year. (3) No child shall be counted as more than a total of one child in the sum of the enrollment of students of a school district under division (A), divisions (B)(1) to (22), or division (D) of this section, except as follows: (a)(i) A child with a disability described in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code may be counted both in formula ADM and in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM and, if applicable, in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM. As provided in division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code, such a child shall be counted in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM in the same proportion that the child is counted in formula ADM. (ii) A child with a disability described in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code may be counted both in enrolled ADM and in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM and, if applicable, in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM. As provided in division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code, such a child shall be counted in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM in the same proportion that the child is counted in enrolled ADM. (b)(i) A child enrolled in career-technical education programs or classes described in section 3317.014 of the Revised Code may be counted both in formula ADM and category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM and, if applicable, in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM. Such a child shall be counted in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM in the same proportion as the percentage of time that the child spends in the career-technical education programs or classes. (ii) A child enrolled in career-technical education programs or classes described in section 3317.014 of the Revised Code may be counted both in enrolled ADM and category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM and, if applicable, in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM. Such a child shall be counted in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM in the same proportion as the percentage of time that the child spends in the career-technical education programs or classes. (4) Based on the information reported under this section, the department shall determine the total student count, as defined in section 3301.011 of the Revised Code, for each school district. (D)(1) The superintendent of each joint vocational school district shall report and certify to the department as of the last day of October, March, and June of each year the enrollment of students receiving services from schools under the superintendent's supervision so that the department can calculate the district's enrolled ADM, formula ADM, total ADM, category one through five career-technical education ADM, category one through three English learner ADM, category one through six special education ADM, and for purposes of provisions of law outside of Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code, average daily membership. The enrollment reported and certified by the superintendent, except as otherwise provided in this division, shall consist of the number of students in grades six through twelve receiving any educational services from the district, except that the following categories of students shall not be included in the determination: (a) Students enrolled in adult education classes; (b) Adjacent or other district joint vocational students enrolled in the district under an open enrollment policy pursuant to section 3313.98 of the Revised Code; (c) Students receiving services in the district pursuant to a compact, cooperative education agreement, or a contract, but who are entitled to attend school in a city, local, or exempted village school district whose territory is not part of the territory of the joint vocational district; (d) Students for whom tuition is payable pursuant to sections 3317.081 and 3323.141 of the Revised Code. (2) To enable the department to obtain the data needed to complete the calculation of payments pursuant to this chapter, each superintendent shall certify from the report provided under division (D)(1) of this section the enrollment for each of the following categories of students: (a) Students enrolled in each individual grade included in the joint vocational district schools, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (b) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for the category one disability described in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (c) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for the category two disabilities described in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (d) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for category three disabilities described in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (e) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for category four disabilities described in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (f) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for the category five disabilities described in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (g) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for category six disabilities described in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (h) Students receiving category one career-technical education services, described in division (A)(1) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (i) Students receiving category two career-technical education services, described in division (A)(2) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (j) Students receiving category three career-technical education services, described in division (A)(3) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (k) Students receiving category four career-technical education services, described in division (A)(4) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (l) Students receiving category five career-technical education services, described in division (A)(5) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (m) English learners described in division (A) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (n) English learners described in division (B) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (o) English learners described in division (C) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (p) Students who are economically disadvantaged, as defined by the department, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section. A student shall not be categorically excluded from the number reported under division (D)(2)(p) of this section based on anything other than family income. The superintendent of each joint vocational school district shall also indicate the city, local, or exempted village school district in which each joint vocational district pupil is entitled to attend school pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (E) In each school of each city, local, exempted village, joint vocational, and cooperative education school district there shall be maintained a record of school enrollment, which record shall accurately show, for each day the school is in session, the actual enrollment in regular day classes. For the purpose of determining the enrollment of students, the enrollment figure of any school shall not include any pupils except those pupils described by division (A) or (D) of this section. The record of enrollment for each school shall be maintained in such manner that no pupil shall be counted as enrolled prior to the actual date of entry in the school and also in such manner that where for any cause a pupil permanently withdraws from the school that pupil shall not be counted as enrolled from and after the date of such withdrawal. There shall not be included in the enrollment of any school any of the following: (1) Any pupil who has graduated from the twelfth grade of a public or nonpublic high school; (2) Any pupil who is not a resident of the state; (3) Any pupil who was enrolled in the schools of the district during the previous school year when assessments were administered under section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code but did not take one or more of the assessments required by that section and was not excused pursuant to division (C)(1) or (3) of that section; (4) Any pupil who has attained the age of twenty-two years, except for veterans of the armed services whose attendance was interrupted before completing the recognized twelve-year course of the public schools by reason of induction or enlistment in the armed forces and who apply for reenrollment in the public school system of their residence not later than four years after termination of war or their honorable discharge; (5) Any pupil who has a certificate of high school equivalence as defined in section 5107.40 of the Revised Code. If, however, any veteran described by division (E)(4) of this section elects to enroll in special courses organized for veterans for whom tuition is paid under the provisions of federal laws, or otherwise, that veteran shall not be included in the enrollment of students determined under this section. Notwithstanding division (E)(3) of this section, the enrollment of any school may include a pupil who did not take an assessment required by section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code if the department of education and workforce grants a waiver from the requirement to take the assessment to the specific pupil and a parent is not paying tuition for the pupil pursuant to section 3313.6410 of the Revised Code. The department may grant such a waiver only for good cause in accordance with rules adopted by the department. The enrolled ADM, formula ADM, total ADM, category one through five career-technical education ADM, category one through three English learner ADM, category one through six special education ADM, transportation ADM, and, for purposes of provisions of law outside of Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code, average daily membership of any school district shall be determined in accordance with rules adopted by the department. (F)(1) If a student attending a community school under Chapter 3314., a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code is not included in the formula ADM calculated for the school district in which the student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code, the department shall adjust the formula ADM of that school district to include the student in accordance with division (C)(2) of this section. (2) If a student awarded an educational choice scholarship is not included in the formula ADM of the school district in which the student resides, the department shall adjust the formula ADM of that school district to include the student. (3) If a student awarded a scholarship under the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program is not included in the formula ADM of the school district in which the student resides, the department shall adjust the formula ADM of that school district to include the student. (G)(1)(a) The superintendent of an institution operating a special education program pursuant to section 3323.091 of the Revised Code shall, for the programs under such superintendent's supervision, certify to the department, in the manner prescribed by the director of education and workforce, both of the following: (i) The unduplicated count of the number of all children with disabilities other than preschool children with disabilities receiving services at the institution for each category of disability described in divisions (A) to (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code adjusted for the portion of the year each child is so enrolled; (ii) The unduplicated count of the number of all preschool children with disabilities in classes or programs for whom the district is eligible to receive funding under section 3317.0213 of the Revised Code adjusted for the portion of the year each child is so enrolled, reported according to the categories prescribed in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code. (b) The superintendent of an institution with career-technical education units approved under section 3317.05 of the Revised Code shall, for the units under the superintendent's supervision, certify to the department the enrollment in those units, in the manner prescribed by the director of education and workforce. (2) The superintendent of each county board of developmental disabilities that maintains special education classes under section 3317.20 of the Revised Code or provides services to preschool children with disabilities pursuant to an agreement between the county board and the appropriate school district shall do both of the following: (a) Certify to the department, in the manner prescribed by the department, the enrollment in classes under section 3317.20 of the Revised Code for each school district that has placed children in the classes; (b) Certify to the department, in the manner prescribed by the department, the unduplicated count of the number of all preschool children with disabilities enrolled in classes for which the board is eligible to receive funding under section 3317.0213 of the Revised Code adjusted for the portion of the year each child is so enrolled, reported according to the categories prescribed in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, and the number of those classes. (H) Except as provided in division (I) of this section, when any city, local, or exempted village school district provides instruction for a nonresident pupil whose attendance is unauthorized attendance as defined in section 3327.06 of the Revised Code, that pupil's enrollment shall not be included in that district's enrollment figure used in calculating the district's payments under this chapter. The reporting official shall report separately the enrollment of all pupils whose attendance in the district is unauthorized attendance, and the enrollment of each such pupil shall be credited to the school district in which the pupil is entitled to attend school under division (B) of section 3313.64 or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code as determined by the department. (I) This division shall not apply on or after September 30, 2021. (1) A city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district admitting a scholarship student of a pilot project district pursuant to division (C) of section 3313.976 of the Revised Code may count such student in its enrollment. (2) In any year for which funds are appropriated for pilot project scholarship programs, a school district implementing a state-sponsored pilot project scholarship program that year pursuant to sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code may count in its enrollment: (a) All children residing in the district and utilizing a scholarship to attend kindergarten in any alternative school, as defined in section 3313.974 of the Revised Code; (b) All children who were enrolled in the district in the preceding year who are utilizing a scholarship to attend an alternative school. (J) The superintendent of each cooperative education school district shall certify to the director of education and workforce, in a manner prescribed by the department, the applicable enrollments for all students in the cooperative education district, also indicating the city, local, or exempted village district where each pupil is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (K) If the director of education and workforce determines that a component of the enrollment certified or reported by a district superintendent, or other reporting entity, is not correct, the director of education and workforce may order that the district's enrolled ADM, formula ADM, or both be adjusted in the amount of the error. (L) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, a student enrolled in a preschool program operated by the city, local, or exempted village school district in which the student resides is deemed to be entitled to attend school in that district under section 3313.64 of the Revised Code for the purposes of calculating the district's state core foundation funding under this chapter. Sec. 3317.083. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Family income multiple" means a multiple determined as follows: (a) For a student with a family adjusted gross income at or below 250% of the federal poverty guidelines, 0.00; (b) For a student with a family adjusted gross income above 250% of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below 270% of the federal poverty guidelines, 0.05; (c) For a student with a family adjusted gross income above 270% of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below 290% of the federal poverty guidelines, 0.10; (d) For a student with a family adjusted gross income above 290% of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below 310% of the federal poverty guidelines, 0.20; (e) For a student with a family adjusted gross income above 310% of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below 330% of the federal poverty guidelines, 0.30; (f) For a student with a family adjusted gross income above 330% of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below 350% of the federal poverty guidelines, 0.40; (g) For a student with a family adjusted gross income above 350% of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below 370% of the federal poverty guidelines, 0.50; (h) For a student with a family adjusted gross income above 370% of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below 390% of the federal poverty guidelines, 0.60; (i) For a student with a family adjusted gross income above 390% of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below 410% of the federal poverty guidelines, 0.70; (j) For a student with a family adjusted gross income above 410% of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below 430% of the federal poverty guidelines, 0.80; (k) For a student with a family adjusted gross income above 430% of the federal poverty guidelines, but at or below 450% of the federal poverty guidelines, 0.90; (l) For a student with a family adjusted gross income above 450% of the federal poverty guidelines, 1.00. (2) "Federal poverty guidelines" has the same meaning as in section 5101.46 of the Revised Code. (3) "Maximum amount" means an amount of tuition calculated for a student as follows: [The school district's base cost per pupil - (the school district's base cost per pupil X the school district's state share percentage)] X 0.40 X the student's family income multiple (B) Except as provided for in division (E) of this section, the board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district operating a preschool program in accordance with section 3313.646 of the Revised Code may charge tuition for a student's participation in the program. The district board shall adopt a resolution establishing tuition for participation in that program. The district board shall hold at least one public hearing prior to adopting the resolution. (C) The amount of tuition charged for a student under this section shall not exceed the student's maximum amount, unless the student's family has an adjusted gross income above seven hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines. A district may charge a student with a family income above seven hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines any amount it determines appropriate. A district board shall establish multiple payment plans from which a student's parent may choose to pay the required amount of tuition. A district board shall at least establish payment plans that permit a parent to pay the tuition in one lump sum payment, to pay the tuition in nine equal payments, and to pay the tuition in equal monthly payments. A district board shall not charge an additional fee or interest to a student's parent for electing to pay tuition in multiple equal payments. (D) Once the department of education and workforce determines the school financing system established in H.B. 110 of the 134th general assembly has been fully implemented, the department shall notify each school district of that fact and the school year in which the system is fully implemented. No school district shall charge tuition in accordance with this section for the school year in which the school financing system is fully implemented, or in any subsequent school year, unless the district receives a two-year waiver from the department to continue charging tuition. A school district may apply to renew a waiver. A waiver or waiver renewal request shall be processed in accordance with division (E) of this section. (E) A two-year waiver or a waiver renewal request under this section shall be submitted, approved or disapproved, and, if applicable, appealed, as follows: (1) Not later than the third day of March prior to the first school year of the waiver's term, a school district shall submit the request to the department. Prior to submitting the request, the district's board of education shall hold a public hearing on the issue and adopt a resolution requesting the waiver or renewal. (2) Within thirty days after receiving a request under division (E)(1) of this section, prior to the first day of July of the first school year in the waiver's term, the department shall approve or disapprove the request and notify the district; (3) If the department disapproves a request, the district may appeal the decision within fifteen days after receiving notice of the waiver's denial to the state board of education. (4) Within fifteen days after receiving the appeal request under division (E)(3) of this section, the state board shall conduct a public hearing regarding the appeal. At that public hearing, the district superintendent and the deputy director of primary and secondary education shall each make a presentation to the state board regarding the disapproval, and the state board shall vote on whether to approve or disapprove the appeal. If a majority of the members of the state board vote in favor of the appeal, the waiver is approved. Sec. 3321.01. (A)(1) As used in this chapter, "parent," "guardian," or "other person having charge or care of a child" means either parent unless the parents are separated or divorced or their marriage has been dissolved or annulled, in which case "parent" means the parent who is the residential parent and legal custodian of the child. If the child is in the legal or permanent custody of a person or government agency, "parent" means that person or government agency. When a child is a resident of a home, as defined in section 3313.64 of the Revised Code, and the child's parent is not a resident of this state, "parent," "guardian," or "other person having charge or care of a child" means the head of the home. A child between six and eighteen years of age is "of compulsory school age" for the purpose of sections 3321.01 to 3321.13 of the Revised Code. A child under six years of age who has been enrolled in kindergarten also shall be considered "of compulsory school age" for the purpose of sections 3321.01 to 3321.13 of the Revised Code unless at any time the child's parent or guardian, at the parent's or guardian's discretion and in consultation with the child's teacher and principal, formally withdraws the child from kindergarten. The compulsory school age of a child shall not commence until the beginning of the term of such schools, or other time in the school year fixed by the rules of the board of the district in which the child resides. (2) Each school district board of education shall admit to kindergarten any student who is five or, for a student who has not completed first grade, six years of age by the first day of instruction of the school year of admittance. In a district in which all children are admitted to the first grade in August or September, a child shall be admitted if the child is six years of age by the thirtieth day of September of the year of admittance, or by the first day of a term or semester other than one beginning in August or September in school districts granting admittance at the beginning of such term or semester. A child who does not meet the age requirements of this section for admittance to kindergarten or first grade, but who will be five or six years old, respectively, prior to the first day of January of the school year in which admission is requested, shall be evaluated for early admittance in accordance with district policy upon referral by the child's parent or guardian, an educator employed by the district, a preschool educator who knows the child, or a pediatrician or psychologist who knows the child. Following an evaluation in accordance with a referral under this section, the district board shall decide whether to admit the child. If a child for whom admission to kindergarten or first grade is requested will not be five or six years of age, respectively, prior to the first day of January of the school year in which admission is requested, the child shall be admitted only in accordance with the district's acceleration policy adopted under section 3324.10 of the Revised Code. (3) Notwithstanding division (A)(2) of this section, beginning with the school year that starts in 2001 and continuing thereafter the board of education of any district may adopt a resolution establishing the first day of August in lieu of the thirtieth day of September as the required date by which students must have attained the age specified in that division for admittance to first grade. (4) After a student has been admitted to kindergarten in a school district or chartered nonpublic school, no board of education of a school district to which the student transfers shall deny that student admission based on the student's age. (B) As used in division (C) of this section, "successfully completed kindergarten" means that the child has completed the kindergarten requirements at one of the following: (1) A public or chartered nonpublic school; (2) A kindergarten class that is both of the following: (a) Offered by a child care provider licensed under Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code; (b) If offered after July 1, 1991, is directly taught by a teacher who holds one of the following: (i) A valid educator license issued under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code; (ii) A Montessori preprimary credential or age-appropriate diploma granted by the American Montessori society or the association Montessori internationale; (iii) Certification determined under division (F) of this section to be equivalent to that described in division (B)(2)(b)(ii) of this section; (iv) Certification for teachers in nontax-supported schools pursuant to section 3301.071 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, no school district shall admit to the first grade any child who has not successfully completed kindergarten. (2) Notwithstanding division (A)(2) of this section, any student who has successfully completed kindergarten in accordance with section (B) of this section shall be admitted to first grade. (D) The scheduling of times for kindergarten classes and length of the school day for kindergarten shall be determined by the board of education of a city, exempted village, or local school district. (E) Any kindergarten class offered by a child care provider or school described by division (B)(1) or (B)(2)(a) of this section shall be developmentally appropriate. (F) Upon written request of a child care provider described by division (B)(2)(a) of this section, the department of education and workforce shall determine whether certification held by a teacher employed by the provider meets the requirement of division (B)(2)(b)(iii) of this section and, if so, shall furnish the provider a statement to that effect. (G) As used in this division, "all-day kindergarten" has the same meaning as in section 3321.05 of the Revised Code. (1) A school district that is offering all-day kindergarten for the first time or that charged fees or tuition for all-day kindergarten in the 2012-2013 school year may charge fees or tuition for a student enrolled in all-day kindergarten in any school year following the 2012-2013 school year. The department shall adjust the district's average daily membership certification under section 3317.03 of the Revised Code by one-half of the full-time equivalency for each student charged fees or tuition for all-day kindergarten under this division. If a district charges fees or tuition for all-day kindergarten under this division, the district shall develop a sliding fee scale based on family incomes. (2) The department shall conduct an annual survey of each school district described in division (G)(1) of this section to determine the following: (a) Whether the district charges fees or tuition for students enrolled in all-day kindergarten; (b) The amount of the fees or tuition charged; (c) How many of the students for whom tuition is charged are eligible for free lunches under the "National School Lunch Act," 60 Stat. 230 (1946), 42 U.S.C. 1751, as amended, and the "Child Nutrition Act of 1966," 80 Stat. 885, 42 U.S.C. 1771, as amended, and how many of the students for whom tuition is charged are eligible for reduced price lunches under those acts; (d) How many students are enrolled in traditional half-day kindergarten rather than all-day kindergarten. Each district shall report to the department, in the manner prescribed by the department, the information described in divisions (G)(2)(a) to (d) of this section. The department shall issue an annual report on the results of the survey and shall post the report on its web site. The department shall issue the first report not later than April 30, 2008, and shall issue a report not later than the thirtieth day of April each year thereafterA district shall not charge tuition for any child enrolled in its all-day kindergarten program. Sec. 3321.05. (A) As used in this section, "all-day kindergarten" means a kindergarten class that is in session for not less than the same number of clock hours each week as for students in grades one through six. (B) Any Each city, exempted village, and local school district may , community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, and chartered nonpublic school that offers a kindergarten program shall operate an all-day kindergarten or extended kindergarten, but no district shall require any student to attend kindergarten for more than the number of clock hours required each day for traditional kindergarten by the minimum standards adopted under division (D) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code. Each school district that operates all-day or extended kindergarten shall accommodate kindergarten students whose parents or guardians elect to enroll them for the minimum number of hoursprogram. (C) A school district may use space in child care centers licensed under Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code to provide all-day kindergarten under this section. Sec. 3323.02. As used in this section, "IDEIA" means the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004," Pub. L. No. 108-446. It is the purpose of this chapter to ensure that all children with disabilities residing in this state who are at least three years of age and less than twenty-two years of age, including children with disabilities who have been suspended or expelled from school, have available to them a free appropriate public education. No school district, county board of developmental disabilities, or other educational agency shall receive state or federal funds for special education and related services unless those services for children with disabilities are provided in accordance with IDEIA and related provisions of the Code of Federal Regulations, the provisions of this chapter, rules and standards adopted by the department of education and workforce, and any procedures or guidelines issued by the director of education and workforce. Any options or discretion provided to the state by IDEIA may be exercised in state law or in rules or standards adopted by the department of education and workforce. The department of education and workforce shall establish rules or standards for the provision of special education and related services for all children with disabilities who are at least three years of age and less than twenty-two years of age residing in the state, regardless of the severity of their disabilities, including children with disabilities who have been suspended or expelled from school. The department of education and workforce shall consult with the department of children and youth on rules or standards regarding the provision of special education and related services for children with disabilities from three to five years of age. The state law and the rules or standards of the department of education and workforce may impose requirements that are not required by IDEIA or related provisions of the Code of Federal Regulations. The school district of residence is responsible, in all instances, for ensuring that the requirements of Part B of IDEIA are met for every eligible child in its jurisdiction, regardless of whether services are provided by another school district, other educational agency, or other agency, department, or entity, unless IDEIA or related provisions of the Code of Federal Regulations, another section of this chapter, or a rule adopted by the department of education and workforce specifies that another school district, other educational agency, or other agency, department, or entity is responsible for ensuring compliance with Part B of IDEIA. The department of children and youth shall, as appropriate, incorporate the department of education and workforce's rules or standards for providing special education and related services for children with disabilities into the licensing requirements for preschool programs under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding division (A)(4) of section 3301.53 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted pursuant to that section and division (A) of section 3313.646 of the Revised Code, a A board of education of a school district may provide special education and related services for preschool children with disabilities in accordance with this chapter and section 3301.52, divisions (A)(1) to (3) and (A)(5) and (6) of section 3301.53, and sections 3301.54 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code. The department of education and workforce may require any state or local agency to provide documentation that special education and related services for children with disabilities provided by the agency are in compliance with the requirements of this chapter. Not later than the first day of February of each year the department of education and workforce shall furnish the chairpersons of the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate with a report on the status of implementation of special education and related services for children with disabilities required by this chapter. The report shall include but shall not be limited to the following items: the most recent available figures on the number of children identified as children with disabilities and the number of identified children receiving special education and related services. The information contained in these reports shall be public information. Section 4. That existing sections 3301.50, 3301.53, 3301.54, 3301.56, 3313.48, 3313.64, 3313.646, 3313.842, 3313.98, 3313.981, 3314.03, 3314.08, 3317.011, 3317.0110, 3317.02, 3317.0213, 3317.03, 3321.01, 3321.05, and 3323.02 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 5. Sections 3 and 4 of this act take effect July 1, 2031. Section 6. This act shall be known as the Preschool for All Act. Section 7. Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code is presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended by both H.B. 10 and H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section in effect prior to the effective date of the section as presented in this act.